Size: 26,533 acres
Once the marriage was over and my new life began, I hoped that my children would understand why their parents divorced and the truth would be seen. I hoped they wouldn’t believe the lie that I didn’t love them anymore. This was a point in my life that I desperately held on to hope.
GeGe (Granny)
My mom often tells me that perhaps my kids and I should live in the mountains, free of neighbors except for Mother Nature who will always understand the noise my kids create everyday which she added “might be too much for the human ear to handle. “
Another salad. I cannot have enough of them, especially now that it's so hot outside. And every monday I say to myself "from today on I will be on a diet", and I need to eat lots of salads with vitamins, minerals and fibres!
self-explanatory. This will definitely not be part of the origin sequence for the new Ninja Turtles because it is not serious or corny. It is pure joy.
I am unable to reduce how intense I exercise._____
That's it, it's gone. I've lost it. A series of brutal things and I am unhinged, wishing I could plant blind happiness on my face.
In my attempt to not fall into the abyss that is the couch I've begun making lists on things I need to do during the day. When I was working I had a short list, but those were things that I needed to get done that month, not that day.
It may appear that I'm being hard on this brew (especially in view of the fact that I've already stated how agreeably it tastes) but given the reality of it's overall taste, look and feel, there really seems very little point in not emphasising exactly what you should expect from it. And the dutiful public servant in me does feel inclined to redress the reality balance in response to Badger's gently misleading use of the old 'S' word.
Aren't these some brightly colored books?
Bored to Death: Bergen between Hoyt and Bond in Brooklyn
The Father is made of none, neither created, nor begotten.
01.02.82 Bristol Locarno
We didn’t go there on this trip, but the dinner entrees include plenty of seafood: fish of the day, arctic char, cod or scallops. There’s also pasta, roasted chicken, steak frites and pork shoulder. All range from $13 to $19.00.
This tremendously ear-pleasing cassette came out on SSF Tapes (+tumblr blogspot) about eight months ago. It's sofa-king good. Bedphones is a one-man avant-pop project from the periphery of Chicagoland (namely, Crystal Lake, Illinois). The sound is pretty eclectic, with acoustic guitars, 'lectric beats, ethereal vocals, mandolins, and keyboard-ish stuff coming together to make a really comfy grey-day listen. (Not that it sounds 'grey' or bland, mind you, but rather it is something to keep your mind awake on that sort of day -- and we get plenty of those during Midwestern winters/springs/autumns). I've been spinning this pretty frequently since I got it in the mail, and it's one of those albums that just kind of feels good to listen to. Relaxing, engaging, and original. I can't speak from experience, but this tape would probably go great with opiates (*I am not endorsing the use of opiates).
Release Date : 11 October 2002
Now it's your turn to show us your Birthday cards or creations! See upload instructions below! There will be five free digi's given to one lucky challenge participant who will be chosen by Random.org at the end of the month! You may use images from any company and still be included in the draw for the blog candy prize! Those who use one of Crissy's images, either from her rubber or digital collections will be entered twice in the draw. But please respect the rule of no more than three entries per
Near the spot where Xu Guan had found the gun, he found a musty canvas bag. Inside the bag were three full boxes of #2 shot 12 gauge shells and a partially empty box of #6 shot shells also in 12 gauge. The boxes turned to mush in Xu Guan’s hands. Most of the brass on the shells was corroded.
I have been through the introductory class of all of my courses now, and one common thread exists: There is some level of disingenuous nanny-ism on the part of my professors towards their students. For the most part, my professors have been extremely specific in their expectations. After all, the syllabus is sort of a "contract" between the student and the professor. "This is what I expect of you, and this is what you should expect of me," is the general message.
A satay variant from Bali, a famous hunted destination. Unlike most varieties of satay, unfeigned is unreal from minced beef, tricky, fish, pork, or even turtle meat, which is in consequence mixed disguise grated coconut, thick coconut milk, lemon liquid, shallots, and pepper. Incision around bamboo, sugar cane or lemon grass sticks, live is for grilled on starless.
We should all write to Bloggers, or drop the device, or device something else.
The trees looked shaken but not stirred. They stood dozing in the gentle breeze tired after the night’s battle.
Today was good day that got made even better by some super after school time spent with Sydney. I picked her up at her sitter's house and we went off on an adventure. (Papa was at the farm spraying our grapes.)
Pipsqueak sat on an upended crate, his feet dangling above the ground. “Her brother got his brains splattered by the coppers trying to lift some groceries.”
Inhabitants of the planet Telos. The Cryons were a feminine species adapted to the freezing subterranean conditions of their planet. Telos had been invaded by the Cybermen who had almost wiped the Cryons out.
If you are going to be shrinking your final piece: whenever possible, color the full scale version, then shrink later. This helps you have the most detail and it is much easier to accurately color tiny areas if they are slightly larger.
ATT’s former adviser Bani Kanté, who also oversaw Libyan investments in Mali, was another high-profile figure whose arrest became known on Tuesday. Two more, according to local sources, are Babaly Ba, director of the Banque Malienne de Solidarité, and Adama Sangaré, mayor of Bamako.
Email freakout. If you get into this and try this trick (you almost certainly will with MLSP and AMM- they love this) then just get ready for the “AUGH! OH! MY EYE BALLS! MY HEAD IS SPINNING, WHERE AM I?!?!?!?!?!?!?!?”
Young Frankenstein: Only Mel Brooks and Gene Wilder could come up with something this funny! Obviously this is another favorite, but it needed to be watched for the holiday. SO hilarious! It's a classic!
. . . which has some very interesting bridges, including the Millennium Bridge (below), also known as the "winking eye" or "blinking eye" bridge. As one can see from the darkness of the next photo, however, the weather was taking a turn for the worse, so I pressed on, eager to reach the green, softer footing of the English countryside.
Now he is compiling interviews of celebrities who have overcome hardships and hoping his that baseball-sized rubber “Gratitude Ball” he created will catch on. It’s a reminder to folks to connect with and thank others.
How can we allow this to continue?
wow I just heard...
The travellers have set up camp just as local farmer. Phyllis McBain, attended a meeting in Edinburgh to discuss national guidance for encampments.
Plus, the party sounds like a totally wild time. Don't think for a moment that it's the same old bullshit you've been hearing at every other "advertising is dead" conference. Heck no. This one sounds like a real fun fest...
All that was really left to do was eat one. Hard work, but I guess if I have to, I will just to be able to share my muffin with all of you. What a treat it was. I had to make a cup of coffee to really enjoy my midmorning treat. The kiddos loved them, I mean, really, who wouldn't?? Really, it was a super easy muffin to make, and I bet it would make a great treat around Christmas time in a pretty mug with the recipe attached and tied with a bow. Hmmm...gotta keep that idea around for next year.
Dr. Rosser — a biologist herself, provost at San Francisco State University, and former dean at Georgia Tech — attributes the strong representation of scientists in leadership roles to several factors, including experience in finding funding support, managing budgets and projects, and working with teams. I would add the ability to understand and analyze data and experience knowing when the data are complete and strong enough to reach a conclusion/decision.
Now let's get one thing straight. Jeffscape is not afraid. Not of anything. I'm quite serious about that. those who know him on the blog, see the arrogant shithead that he can be. Well he is a bit but he is not afraid of anything. He was extremely skeptical but always hopeful, came armed with a mini-maglite LED torch and was determined to either prove the existence or non existence of the paranormal. I on the other hand, don't believe in ghosts but the thought freaks me out and I'm slightly terrified of the dark. Whilst I'm happy to go on a tour, wondering around the rambling site after the tour in the wee small hours was not my idea of fun but I wasn't about to be left in a room where the bell hop had told us 'a little incident happened last night' so I clung like a limpet to the poor sod. Thanks to his royal intrepidness exploring the possibility of finding Mr Chen, his belt has now been stretched 2 notches since I grabbed the back of it for at least 20 minutes while he took me into the pitch black of the Asiatic Quarters. So, there's a 33 year old Veteran determined to find a spook, and a nervous (no need to know my age right now) 'unbeliever' who began to doubt her convictions hanging on in case he left me behind and trust me, he probably would have!
I have found out that I am very critical of myself. My current world is filled with self-doubt and uncertainty. Where did I put my notebook? Did I take my medicine this morning? Where are my keys? Why won’t the kids do as I ask? Where is the confidence I know used to be there?
"With all of the Type A personalities in the room . . . . . . "
The center panel and outside border were purchased last April, everything else was made from the left over fabric from the last coffee quilt. Unfortunately, it's been on the frame since May..... seven months, how's that for procrastination?????
What about a staff member that handles the enormous amount of required paperwork? If their salary is around $40,000 per year after FICA and unemployment insurance costs, that's another $5 per patient. So now, just to handle the BS and high insurance cost, you've spent up to $35 dollars just to walk in the door. Neither you, or the doctor gets any benefit from this, except the doctor may feel a little more comfortable knowing they might avoid an ugly lawsuit, or intrusive meddling by a bureaucrat.
- Betty C.
A Brightly-Coloured Box Full of Stars by Dorian Dawes
And then, those same “weak” people handed Wei his first defeat.
KABUL: The Taliban militia announced they would launch their annual “spring offensive” across Afghanistan on Thursday, threatening to target US-led NATO troops and their allies with renewed vigour.
and relative financial standing are all being harnessed to the Left's
1. take a baggie, cut it along the side and along the bottom. I feel ziplocks work best.
Fiesta - substitute the garlic for 2 tsp. chili powder, sub the BBQ sauce for salsa, and substitute the cheddar for Mexican style cheese.
The test was good, I panicked at times .. and got myself flustered when some things weren’t going right .. but I passed it and that’s all that mattered. The thing that calmed me down more than anything was hearing my grade for the previous assignment. I got a B- .. so the pressure was kind of taken off my shoulders for the test .. because I had a strong chance of passing the module as a whole regardless .. always nice to know.
I was surfing Youtube last night for some research on accents and came across some songs that bring back so many memories of my childhood. Teenage years actually.
27) Would you like to help me with my self esteem?
I’m from New Orleans. I don’t say this in any kind of way, except to say that I’m from New Orleans – a very, very southern city that has maybe seen snow all of 3 recorded times in history. One such time was the day my middle sister was born in 1989. Another was last year. That’s how much it snows… that I can tell you the days with no hesitation. And each of these snow “storms” mayyyybe had at most 2 inches, although I wouldn’t bet my life on it.
It's kind of like running a marathon. You can plan, you can visualize, and you can have a goal. But, in reality, you have very little control over what happens when the day arrives. You take what the situation gives you, you push through, and hopefully at the end you can look back and smile.
Ek skryf toe terug, met die volgende:
Our evenings were a nice way to unwind. It was really fun to get dolled up and connect over meals together. Look how happy we all were!
Eyewitness accounts are scattered beyond this point - it is unknown how long this young man, a teenager at the time, hit Ingram, when or why he stopped, what condition he left Ingram in, or where he went afterward. A group of people was seen gathering around the victim, punching and kicking him, and another group (or perhaps the same one) was seen stealing money from his pocket and performing wrestling holds on his unconscious body, but by the time the police arrived, Ingram was unconscious and alone. He would never wake up.
Here are those 3 figs in their new home where they will overwinter until spring later on in the year. Behind them we have our 2 bananas and their “humidity generator” a.k.a. a Monstera deliciosa that allows them to have their own little humid microclimate. They lived through last winter without their new friend so hopefully they will arrive in spring as happy little customers. We tidied out the glasshouse to prepare it for winter and its inhabitants for receival of the maximum light that they can get over the next few months
Thus much let me avow-
I also LOVED seeing how loyal and caring Tod is in this book. It just caused major "aww!" from me - even if he was less caring about what Kaylee and Nash had to risk to help Addy. And oooh, scary when he doesn't tell her how bad her injury could get, and how he dealt with John Dekker. But I think it shows just how he treats people who hurt those he loves, and some foresight to what will eventually happen.
Going back to the hardware design, we’re hesitant to jump to conclusions at this point, but we do know that these next-generation iPhones are definitely floating around with shells that look identical to the iPhone 4. Because a report claimed that Apple is stuffing next-generation guts into iPhone 4 casings to throw off leaks, we don’t want to affirm that the new iPhone retains the iPhone 4 design. In addition, a new design has been rumored based on recent “iPhone 5″ case leaks.
Why? Because of how you REACTED. You really do not have any control over 10% of what happens. The other 90% was determined by your reaction.
It’s like Stephen King said, sometimes you can learn more from other’s mistakes than from their successes.
I dug out the first quarter of the section...then Chris dug out the rest and made me use the little shovel to dig out around the pool pump equipment. Chris is all about instant gratification on these projects!
Back from the shadows again: For the first time since early March, I’ll be returning to KSFR-FM 101.1 to do my radio shows this weekend.
Donald James Burns, 61, Nissequogue, N.Y.
fail, be chewed, ground and crushed
One of my absolute favourite things about writing a novel is all the extraordinary things you discover while doing your research that are begging, no, pleading, no, SCREAMING OUT to be used.
That someone, Gaelen, is special in his own way: he’s the last remaining Fey, a creature of the light, innocent and pure, the protector of the remaining joy the Fey bring to the world. Though attracted to Arthur, Gaelen is afraid to trust. He knows he’s being hunted for his power by a force that wants to overthrow Bacchus himself, and Gaelen will have to allow Arthur into his life if he wants to survive.
Heat the cooking oil in a frying pan over medium heat. Arrange the filled rolls in the pan. Add one cup of water, cover then allow to cook over medium heat for about 10 minutes. After the water has boiled away, continue to fry the rolls until both sides are golden brown.
Pour the pudding into a large bowl (or, if preferred, individual coffee cups) and cover tightly with plastic wrap so a skin doesn't form on top of the pudding.
That scintillating double bill, by the way, included Catherine Breillat's latest film Bluebeard and Abbas Kiarostami's 1990 film Close-Up, the latter in a new 35mm restored print. Both films, by the way, are excellent. Breillat's film takes the famous story of the wealthy aristocrat with a blue beard and a murderous past and dissects—with her usual cool precision, intelligent provocation and atmospheric sense of danger—the emotional and sexual complexities underlying not only this fairytale, but perhaps of all the fairytales we hear as children but whose real-world implications we can never fully grasp until we are older and more mature. (Its final image is particularly stunning: gruesome and chock full of devastating implications.)
I've been developing this script for a while, with readings from the Madcap Players in DC, Rhombus in Boston, and input from the Huntington Theatre Company's Playwriting Fellows Program, and folks at the 2011 Seven Devils Conference (run by id theater). I'm very excited to see how this latest version of the script plays out.
"Karuizawa 1997 13YO #3312 for Oxfam. 60.2 per cent alcohol.
The enjoyment factor of this show… it may not have been obvious throughout the review, but I fucking loved watching this show. It is easily the best ‘so bad it’s good’ thing I’ve watched in a long, long while. The trainwreck attraction of this was absolutely glorious, you just don’t get one on this scale like ever. The awful characters, the nonsensical plot, the contrived twists, all of it combined to make Guilty Crown outstandingly hilarious. Adding to the big joke that is this series is just how high profile it was – the staff lineup, the budget, the studio, the fact that it’s a noitaminA series airing over two seasons, which so rarely happens with noitaminA, it looked so set to be a massive, massive thing and seeing it fail this fucking hard was absolutely hilarious. I’m glad I got to watch it as it aired, and I’m sad to see it go because I’ll never get to see something as bad as Guilty Crown in this way for a long, long time.
And it’s likely that all of those fans — in America and overseas — will pour their passions into Panini’s Official UEFA Euro 2012 Sticker & Album Collection, a massive 539-sticker tribute to the tournament that ships May 9.
May the Easter Bunny twitch his whiskers at you and leave you something special... and chocolatey!
Who, that could admire the variance of colors in a garden, can say there is only black and white
In the final scene, Julia is present (disguised as a boy-servant to Proteus and obviously broken-hearted over P.'s pursuit of S.) as is Valentine, who is hidden and does not yet know that Proteus betrayed him. So ... in this setting, Proteus decides he's waited long enough for Silvia and tries to rape her; at which point, Valentine reveals himself and calls Proteus out for being the dick that he is; Proteus is all, Dude, I'm really sorry! And Valentine, who, remember, can't bear the thought of living without Silvia, says to Proteus, That's good enough for me! We're best buds again, and, furthermore, why don't you take my chick?
This time I'm probably making the other "typical" dish - cheese stuffed Padrón peppers. Now the authentic versions will use something like Tetilla (a Galician cows milk cheese) with recommended substitutes of Monterey Jack and Fontina but I've taken a slightly different track and used provolone.
4) A Sikh must keep hair and wear a turban.
Barley*
When I lived in London I couldn't read on the Tube not because most of the time I found myself squashed up against a stranger's nether regions or else stuffed under their arm pit, it was because I didn't want them to know too much about me or to judge me in any way.
People think I don’t care. I forget important conversation, and it looks like I don’t care enough about people to remember things about them and their lives. I miss appointments, so I look like I’m careless and don’t value people’s time. I forget birthdays and holidays, I don’t start tasks, I can’t remember e-mails or phone calls or things I’ve read. It makes me look like I just don’t care, and I’m afraid it will ruin opportunities I need–social, educational, and vocational.
Holding the robin this morning, depressed me for a while. I twittered – appropriately – the report of its death and then wrote 1500 words of a rollicking yarn, without a single reference to birds of any kind.
The product is white, and comes in a handy squeezy tube. The Fab Pore (peel) annoys me because of the pot - I find the squeezy tubes are more convenient. I normally just rub a small amount on my cheeks, chin and nose, and on my forehead if I feel it needs some good stuff. I leave it for a minute or two then wash it off with warm water. It does make your face feel noticeably softer! I find myself sometimes stroking my cheek without realising. I've tried washing it off with cold water too, but it doesn't work as well and I don't get the soft face feeling. More like sticky face feeling. I've never personally tried to remove my makeup with it either (and I always avoid the eye area after my mishap with Clean Mary), but I should think it would work well.
You have made me feel this way…your love, your touch, your conversation,
Busy Signal - Dem Call The Police
We had a wonderful response to our glitter and embossing challenge last week! Thank you to all who played!!
"Hey, mate, you mum's here." Gilly gave him a shake on the shoulder. He wasn't anymore dressed for company than Jonah. Gilly was giving the baby a bottle. Gilly was in his pajama bottoms and barefooted.
hand-painted hardwood arms and legs.
Yesterday was May Day! Did you know that May Day is actually a celebrated Czech Holiday also?!
Landscape photo of the Sandgate area of Newcastle quayside, with the Donna Marika moored next to warehouses. The flagstaff to the right of shot belongs to HMS Calliope.
While working alone at a roadside motel, Michal is harassed by the mafia thugs who arrive to carry out a scheme for their boss, who owns the motel, and Michal will be the unfortunate victim of that scheme. Fleming's dialogue for his bad guys sounds like he copied it from a bad 1930s Bogart movie; however, the two thugs themselves are very well drawn and one of them even has metal teeth which must have inspired the Jaws character who appeared in the film version. The hostage situation he describes is also nail-biting. When James Bond, after getting a flat tire, shows up at the motel, we let out the breath we've been holding because the brave knight has arrived to rescue the damsel in distress. Bond is quickly recruited to save Vivienne (not that it takes much!) and he does so in typical fashion.
I also took away all of her electronic items, until her attitude improves. Then I called my husband and told him in a calm manner, after taking deep breaths, what happened. He agreed with me, saying, “You are right.” Then he said, “By the way, what’s for dinner tonight?”
SHOWTIMES:
So now I am pulled towards a vacuum of no worries and okayness. Everything’s alright, until it explodes. By then, I will be worried and harried and buried by things I will need to do fast and all at the same time. When that time comes. Maybe I should just wait for that day.
This child's birth will signify renewal...........
I don't want to say I've accomplished nothing in that year (I did get a job and some other small things), but let's just say I'm far from what I expected. For example, I had envisioned being done with a personal statement, pre-req classes, and running multiple 5 or 10k races.
I garden for the critters and winged things
Is this coffee?
Ferrell
06-03 New York, NY – Hot 97 Summer Jam
15. Jack Sparrow succeeds.
will not make it through the cold tonight.” The rich man was also a pious man, a devoted man.
4) The Original Star Wars Trilogy – WITHOUT ANY ADDED CRAP:
On the 24th of April, searchers found him in the wreckage of a plane whose wings failed him. There's something heroic about Chesty's falling that way, through the night. It was a brave man's death. Unconquerable, even in death.
They were newly weds and I got an earful about how their commitment was just as sincere and as strong as or stronger than mine was even though they'd decided to never have kids and how dare I compare marriage vows in such a way?
My daughter is going to start pre-school in September and I feel like making some money as well. Buying a bigger house means bigger payments but we see that as an investment. It is very scary for me because I kind of had my IBS under control for a while. Less stress helped a lot but also changes in diet and I am sure losing weight has made a difference too. I am scared that it starts again if I start working again but at least I would be working in my home.
My oldest son says his favorite toy is the firetruck. He thinks the peg person that is small with a black shirt & dark hair is himself. He has quite the adventures, especially when he replaces the fireman with himself! (And the red person in the back is his cousin Parker who I'm told is also a "good guy")
Have I mentioned how perfect this weekend was?
Thank you, Conal--and Gillian. You've spun us all some fabulous answers, and I know many many readers will be even more desperate to read Bloodstone when it comes out on 19th August from Strident Publishing. In fact, I think I'm away now to read it again myself!
Take time this holiday season to rejoice, relax and reflect. Focus your energies on the positives in life going into the New Year. Focus on finishing this year on the positive and starting the New Year off on a positive note. Be grateful for what you have and what you may receive. Take time to reconcile with someone you feel may be holding you back.
All we ask is that your entry is a new one which hasn't been published to your blog prior to the start date of the challenge. We would appreciate a link back to this challenge in your blog post too.
Murphy, on the other hand, has regularly gone on national television and cultivated not knowledge but its opposite, over and over again offering factually inaccurate statements.
[IMDB link] [Netflix link] If anyone watched the 2007 film Bee Movie… This is where it *seems* they stole their ideas from. (In reality, they probably didn’t steal anything — there’s only so many ideas, and everything has been done.)
I'm praying for my friend and her family and my father in law. For health and healing.
she thinks it’s a bore./
“Is the master in?” Addison bit her lip nervously, one of her fingers poised at the corner of it as she tried not to bite her finger.
4. changing positions
Start colouring, and this is why it's handy to have a graphics tablet, you can you a mouse, it's just easier with something that resembles a pen.
And that thought KILLED me!
Ensure that your prospects know their company is appreciated. Give them special deals, discounts dependant on hallmark goals or simply a simple many thanks note. They want to know you value their business or they will often go to someone who can go that extra step.
Henry Morris IV, Director of Donor Relations, has a new money making scheme: if you give him money, he’ll send a loved one a card:
networking and educational opportunities to “rising stars” in fashion
He expresses frustration and even some anger at the church and its failings. Yet he refuses to give up his faith and give up on the church.
in every tree. Once
- Heightened sense of smell. Have you got a dog? It’ll need a bath. Have you got a rug? It’ll need thrown out. Does your partner smoke? You’ll need a new one (just kidding). This works hand in hand with the IdontwanttomovetoofastasIfeellikeImaybesickbutinrealityIwillprobablyjustwretchalittleallday sickness. All of those smells that you may have once quite liked will be more potent than you could ever imagine and more than likely make you feel sick.
I enter the trees and force my way into the woodland.
While Leila ends up safely returned to her grandparents, not everything ends well. Detective Szymanski (not sure if that’s the correct spelling – but it’s actor Mike McGlone, whom you certainly know from the GEICO ads) gets shot in the chest, prompting Carter to cut ties with Reese and Finch and their reckless methods.
And people gave him his “room” too, because that’s
Scott McCormick: The book is based on a cat I used to have named Mr Pants. He was a very precocious animal who used to have all sorts of adventures in my old neighborhood in Philadelphia. He seemed like an obvious inspiration for a children's book; however, when I tried to write one based on his real-life adventures, he suddenly didn't seem very interesting. After all, in kid's books, animals do all sorts of wild and crazy things. Snoopy gets into dogfights with the Red Baron... Mr Pants once got on a Septa bus. Not very interesting. So I shelved it.
4) Meditate on Philippians 4:19
Time for some Feng Shui.
A selection of the above would create so much economic mayhem, the EU would disappear up itself within weeks. Yet in all honesty, I think there is barely a eurocrat or banker in the world that has given this likely eventuality a moment’s thought. In the West, we have become sanitised over three generations to the idea of massive socio-political upheaval. The mistaken conclusion shared by most dealers and traders – that the past is any guide to the future – applies just as much in the cultural sphere.
If you’re not a friend, you’re an enemy. It’s a fact that I’ve struggled with for years and was only reinforced by attending school.
You wait to be lowered in into a stone crypt
Let's try that again. I don't suck. But I'm ridiculously human. And accepting me for Who I Am is a process rather than a switch I can flip.
Dark is the night of fear, still of all sound.
Broccoli)
Art supported me today. he got up early to pick me up. he was involved the entire day i was playing. giving me tips, correcting my moves.
There is nothing wrong with all of the above and I agree with them all. However, the documentary needs to examine critically at the practical implication of the irrationals. From memory, there is only one instance of this, where in the case of communicating with the dead Dawkins is concerned with the mental states of those who have lost their loving ones. I would have liked to see Dawkins apply his usual scholarly excoriation to expose and bulldoze his way through all forms of irrationality, as well as mentioning some stories too. Astrology is not merely harmless as one might think, people do act based on the readings, and I think the quackery of communicating with the dead equates to a form of emotional abuse with these so-called mediums praying upon the fragile and needy mental states of people.
While we can’t put our hands on data telling a similar story for B2C ventures, our personal experience is similar: most sites attempt to corral the all visitors in the same manner… usually through the home page. The reality is this: whether B2B or B2C, the more you segment your audience into unique, discrete cohorts, tailor the value proposition to meet those specific needs, and UNIQUELY DELIVER when they hit a custom-designed/messaged landing page (just for them), the higher your likelihood to convert them. If you are new to this game, the Hubspot piece does a nice job defining the basics:
The readings will be followed by the Arthur Ellis shortlist announcements, for works that were published in 2011. The Arthurs are the annual awards given by the CWC for excellence in Canadian crime and mystery writing (best novel, best first novel, best short story, etc.).
Colonist: "The word ' colonist ' has been used to describe all white colonials, but I have found it necessary to make some distinction between the (two varieties of Afrikaans-)Dutch speakers in South Africa, as well as English speakers.
You can be sure that when he took his family back there, the folks were mystified and amazed that anybody could do this. They thought the horses and bison were real. What the artist himself saw was different: he saw the lines he himself had made and at the same time he saw the evocation of the animals in these lines. He was at the threshold of modern consciousness, which is a self-consciousness.
Here are some bones from yesterday’s press conference call with Jurgen Klinsmann.
High Sold: 29
It terrifies me to think of the trouble they could get into and how easily their lives could be changed by poor choices. So what do we do? We pray!! We pray that God would make them like Daniel- that they would choose to honor God if given the choice…that they would always choose to honor God.
Right now, I’m trying to change this attitude because it causes unnecessary stress. I’m trying to convince myself that it’s ok to get these scores and you shouldn’t compare yourself to anyone. You should just try harder and improve the next time. And if you did yet you still didn’t get a better grade well it’s fine as long as you like what you’re doing…. It’s all about the climb as they say.
from dawn to dusk till nightfall repeatedly
In addition to the complaint, a Facebook page has been created called “Boycott Hands On Originals.” Already, the effort has over 1,200 supporters. Additionally, the Fayette County Public School District has placed a temporary hold on all orders from the t-shirt company, with the city’s mayor, Jim Gray, saying, ”People don’t have patience for this sort of attitude today.”
The Groovy Mums blog hop post usually appears here on Tuesday and with the linky remaining open until the following Monday.
BLOODLINES covers some heavy ground by showing how life lessons, character development and unpaid debts are just a few struggles to overcome. The bond between the four main players, Sydney, Eddie, Adrian and Jill is forming and I can’t wait to see where their journey will lead. VAMPIRE ACADEMY fans will love this series.
Many critics have pointed to the ambiguity of the figure of the governess in Victorian fiction, caught between upstairs and downstairs, and John said he thought that this was pretty central to the ambiguities of this novel, and pushed here to a particular limit. With what seemed to him something of a plot manipulation (the governess not allowed to contact her employer), James forces her into extreme isolation, a situation in which she has no employer to talk to but cannot talk freely to the servants, not even the housekeeper Mrs Grose of whom she longs to make a friend but from whom she must keep a certain professional distance, resulting in a deeply ambiguous relationship. (We hear in passing that she is also isolated from her family by the fact that they are suffering their own troubles, to which she will not add in correspondence.) John pointed out that James often names his characters symbolically (Miss Jessell, was, it seems, a Jezebel, as someone else in the group pointed out; one meaning of the name Miles is 'uncertainty') and John wondered about the apparent negative connotations of the name Mrs Grose, as well as its possible meaning of 'big'. Could it be that the housekeeper is a more significant element in this story than many interpretations have allowed for? It seemed to John that the housekeeper who appears so homely and dependable in the (unreliable) governess's eyes would in reality resent her arrival in the household, having previously been left to run it herself, and having been very close to the little girl Flora who must now remove her affections to the governess. It is interesting that at the end, when Flora turns against the governess and becomes frightened of her, Mrs Grose 'reclaims' her, even to sleep in her room, and then flees with her, albeit it with the governess's 'blessing'. Mrs Grose might well, in terms of social and psychological reality, want the governess out of the way. Could it be that the whole 'haunting' is a setup engineered by Mrs Grose to achieve that very thing?
Greenwich waterfront is doing just fine, with the only waterfront land lingering being the ridiculously over-priced. Here’s Russ Pruner, saying just that.
Bulldoze the city and walk away from Flint as a lost cause?
This is why I wanted to write about my experiences. My first blog post after the April accident was called ‘Normal service to be resumed shortly‘, because I assumed that was true. Yet here we are, nearly at Christmas, and my ‘normal service’ inches closer every month, but is still out of reach. It’s important to say that, thanks to wearing a helmet, I am still here and I do not have serious brain damage. In essence our family life has gone on as happily and fully as ever this year, so I am extremely fortunate, and I don’t want to suggest that my injury is something bigger than it was. However, the general ignorance (which I shared) surrounding concussion and its after-effects is such that most of us probably don’t think it is anything much at all, and sufferers can thus find themselves battling feelings of isolation and confusion in addition to the effects of the injury.
Anyway, moving on… after all that has been discussed in “Metrosexuality, The Modern Masculinty”, I still have my own opinion on what a metrosexual really is. I mean, based on the full meaning of the word -a man with similar attributes to a homosexual, like going shopping, getting pedicure, manicure, etc- I think people just give the term to any man that wants to look decent. That brings to my attention the question of whether we have lower our standards when it comes to the appearance of a person and whats appropriate. I remember I once when to a wedding ceremony and there where people in jeans and shorts just because it was the ceremony and not the reception. I can’t help but think that these people are the same ones that label a man in a suite as a metrosexual. Or even more (not to be so exaggerating) a man who simply likes to groom himself and look good without going to the extreme of actually wearing make-up and other woman-like products.
"By eliminating multiple series, your inventory is always current... With every card available at once, kids will get less duplicate cards. Therefore, they have a better incentive to collect a complete set. So you know they will keep buying all season long!"
In New York
Eggs: Start the day off right with seven grams of protein! Having an egg in the morning will keep your body busy because digesting eggs burns more calories than a carb-infested breakfast.
“ People can be so stupid, but I wanted to blend with everyone as quickly as I could,” he said.
I am proud of never resenting changing a diaper; I didn't enjoy it, really, but I didn't resent it.
on the pane
I chose rum and the two of us have been friendly ever since.
Thank you for all of the sweet comments shared on Twitter and Typepad about the makeover. I'm taking the rest of the night off to relax and spend some quality time with a husband who hasn't seen much of me in the last few days! He's been so great to keep the kids occupied, keep the house running, and keep food in the fridge while I knocked this monster out. I think he's earned at least one long afternoon to ride off into the sunset with his scooter friends.
On that same shopping adventure, I discovered something REALLY important that might come in handy over the next week as we navigate the shopping frenzy of the week before Christmas. The BEST time to go to the mall is at 2:50 pm when all the shoppers turn into pumpkins – oops, wrong holiday – I mean parents as they rush out to pick up their kids from school. Pulling in at 2:06, there was not a spot to be had ANYWHERE in the lot. I circled the rows of cars near the mall entrance where I knew the kiosk I had to visit was (so I could go in for the kill and make a quick exit) but there were no empty spots. Widening my range with each pass, I followed present-laden shoppers walking (most wandering lost) through the parking lot, looking for their cars. Inevitably, every one suddenly switched direction, cutting through to the next row (something you can’t do in a car) as they spotted their vehicle… The lucky car circling for the 19th time in that row wins the prize, drats! I finally lucked out with a distant spot being vacated by a cabbie who failed to draw the attention of other hopeful parkers because he backed in to his spot, so he packed his trunk with shopping bags inconspicuously and, as luck would have it, conveniently started ‘er up just as I made my approach. I was in and out of the mall with my Christmas cache by 2:50 pm and, behold, the lot was EMPTY! There were tons of spots right up front! If I had known, I might have had Sarge pick up the Old Soul and stayed to do more shopping (hah, as if)! Then again, the long walk did me good considering those first 10 pounds I’m still trying to lose.
So we really hope you'll play!
March 8: 1.51 miles; 20 minutes 30 seconds
One more thing, because the Chapel is a functioning one, it remains a holy place and so the guards periodically let out a mighty ‘Shhhhhh’ in unison. It would resonate and was quite powerful. Though it worked for a time, it was like putting a lid on a boiling pot. The pressure would eventually build and the lid/talking would eventually rise again. But I loved that they did not give up.
Here all around you
When someone is speaking - a grown-up let's say-
Romans 13:8-Let no debt remain outstanding, except the continuing debt to love one another, for whoever loves others has fulfilled the law.
For all I know, Vincent could be sending me love notes from heaven. I'll try to keep my eyes peeled and heart open.
more rum for me. And this:
Homegrown talent from the area is pretty thin on the ground. In the late '70s it was cover band hell, and although the OC hardcore sound and look took hold amongst the surf grommets in the early '80s, any punk bands that did form unfortunately never released anything, at least until Asylum in the mid '80s. There are only four (and a half) records from the Gold Coast from the era we cover, and only two we'd consider documenting. Apologies to the Ballistics, Sigh Of Relief and Squadron Leader. This 'un sees a band straddling Joy Division's transition into New Order. The vocals and guitar echoing the former, with the latter being represented by the strong rhythm section and the synth. "Hey, press that button that makes a sound like steam escaping again". We take the piss, but note that this one has survived the cull pile here on several occasions over the last few decades. Something keeps drawing us back. Needless to say it's not the further transition into new romantic horse shit evident on YouTube.
I did the research because I was interested in the effect that today’s strongly-gendered parenting might have on the adults who live in the color-coded worlds of their children. Also, I was looking for a simple way to test whether, or to what extent, color preferences were variable in adulthood (rather than genetic), and the gender of children seemed like a good, mostly-random experiment to test that.
Dads are special people. And don’t forget—Father’s Day is June 17th! Give him the gift of a memory with our Daddy & Me portrait session. It’s the perfect way to commemorate the father-child bond. With a variety of set options, this session can be customized to complement the ages and personality of your little ones. As your children grow, these portraits will become treasured keepsakes that they will share with their own children.
Am I thankful to see my son already searching the scriptures to lead others to truth? Yes!
I love salmon. It is versatile, healthy and easy to make. Salmon lends itself to so many versatile flavor profiles. This evening I added a bit of terriyaki and fresh pineapple and had a refreshing, light, yet satisfying meal. It didn't make me laugh, but it did make me smile and that's a start... right?
It's going to be a year of peace for me, I need it to be.
Sunday morning I awoke to the sounds of kids being bathed, and then as I was fixing breakfast he vacuumed the whole house without being asked. I was like woah, 2012, what did you do with 2011 Hubby because I LIKE IT!?!?!?!
The MACC has listed numerous further concessions associated with Michael Chia as a result of its investigations (below), so why has the Chief Minister denied any dealings with Chia whatsoever? As Chairman of the Board of Trustees at Yayasan Sabah, he exerts ultimate approval over all timber licences, including those given to Chia.
On March 23, 1989 in Salt Lake City, the University of Utah held a press conference to announce the discovery of cold fusion, but the story had already been leaked to the world's most influential financial dailies, the Wall Street Journal and the Financial Times. Both papers continued to print unfailingly optimistic reports for weeks. Among those lured into the swamp was Randell Mills, a 1986 graduate of Harvard Medical School. Two years later Mills held a press conference of his own to announce that it wasn't fusion. It was better! Hydrogen atoms can shrink into "hydrinos," releasing energy. With the 17th anniversary of cold fusion approaching, both papers are now running credulous stories about Mills and his company, BlackLight Power. BLP, which has never produced anything, is rumored to be preparing an IPO.
Woodford held several political posts such as lieutenant governor, assistant US attorney and ambassador to Spain under President McKinley. The article neglects to mention that he was also a congressman representing Brooklyn , 1872-74, a detail found in the Park Slope Neighborhood History Guide released by the Brooklyn Historical Society this past summer.
We take care of our own
Drag: Thanks Ann. I''m here with a man dressed all in yellow, who actually looks like a banana. This man just single handedly foiled a bank hold up and turned the robbers over to police. What is your name, sir?
And then they came for the Catholics, And I didn't speak up because I wasn't a Catholic.
Thanks to Colin Syndercombe for the Cape Town fotos; all others by Will Van Dorp.
And that’s because this is a jokey and campy update of the serious Gothic material presented there. The themes, tropes and situations of the much-cherished series have been spun to support an entirely Burton-esque fish-out-of-water comedy, but one lacking the heart and emotionality of Big Fish (2002) or Edward Scissorhands (1992). Barnabas -- the great Byronic vampire who came before Anne Rice’s Lestat, Forever Knight’s Nick Knight, Joss Whedon’s Angel and Stephanie Meyers’ Edward Cullen – is now a confused misfit tilting at lava lamps and other fads of the 1970s.
Green Food Coloring (1 drop blue/1 drop yellow)
I believe that there is something for everyone, but certain factors can't help but influence peoples' buying habits in general. Constant talk in the media of purse strings naturally makes us more aware and more protective of them. But people still want to be creative, to enhance their surroundings, acquire something unique and irreplaceable, and what I have noticed recently is perhaps the more unique the better.
wiseness
So, after several dress fittings (I ended up with that ghastly frill around my arms when it was decided, without my knowledge, that the dress would be a little too risque without something on my arms), I paraded down a raised platform at the Jackson Country Club on my father's arm on the Friday after Thanksgiving, 1986, and then was forced to attend several Deb parties over the Christmas holidays that were redeemed only by the vast amount of alcohol that was offered at each one.
I post this picture simply for posterity, it's also somewhat cathartic. I am not a 'ticker' and am quite aware of the nonsense of lording it up and showing off about nicely flavoured liquids. But there's something to be said for having more booze than you can nail in one session in your house.
I'm not quite ready for this night to end.
Adorable, aren't they? I likely feel very positive about them because I haven't yet worked on the garden.
The biggest surprise of the night was when I wandered over to the English Bar and had a taste of Theakston’s Best Bitter from the wooden cask. You could really taste the oak of the cask, which permeates the poor little 3.5% beer giving it all sorts of whisky-like flavours. I’m not having a laugh here; Theakston’s may be unfashionable among beer nerds but they should give this one a go – several Theakston beers are available from the wood (I haven’t yet tested the other casks for oakiness).
And the painted ponies go up and down
I have a mastiff-labrador cross named Belle. The name is reflexive as she is named after the Scottish band Belle and Sebastian. Belle and Sebastian named themselves after the early 1980s cartoon about the adventures of a little boy, Sebastian and his big dog, Belle.
finally I told my husband something wasnt right and we needed to go to the hospital
"i only need one." i say.
Assignments:
Cast not your foul notions upon me!
When you figure out which one it is,
My room was on the nice side of the sort of thing I’m used to but then I rarely travel in style. It was in possession of both a television and a kettle so I decided to make a cup of the available green tea and see what Chinese people watch for entertainment. I was only mildly surprised to be greeted by a tightrope walking dog on the very first channel; the programme seemed to bridge a gap between Crufts and Ninja Warrior that I had hitherto thought unbridgeable. After such glorious beginnings the rest of the exhausting number of channels delivered nothing but cold anti-climax in a language I didn’t speak.
The layers of undergarments worn in the 18th century created a protective barrier between one's body and the world. The panier in this sculpture spans nearly four feet at the base making it awkward to move as I found out when I tried on the outfit. As well, I gained an appreciation for why 18th century women needed help to dress! (I photographed myself wearing my creations and showed these self-portraits to Christopher who thought them worthy of being blown up life-size a la Cindy Sherman. That's my next project! In the meantime, here is a documentation photo of the dress.)
...and that's where we are today.
'Tomorrow neveres madam, you told me so, I present inform the penalize spellings of the language, virtuous now!' said the zealous graduate!
or Paypal at flairmwr@yahoo.com
And we all know what a mother is like when her children are hurt wether they know they've been hurt or not.
26) IGOR’S LAMENT – Tony & the Monstrosities
The Kite
“Why should I appear? I am not a witness! If I appear, who will pay for my expenses? I don’t want to use my money and the government’s money,” Ahmad was reported as saying by Sin Chew Daily on Saturday. He had previously said he would attend.
Well, when you can't beat 'em, get a Ripken card of your own right? Once again, Ripken is able to slay a formidable opponent (this time a beat up Vlad card). 4-3 Pinnacle goes back ahead in a rather surprising turn of events!
Chasing the Skip - Janci Patterson
However, later in the day I went to Detroit to go to the North American International Auto Show, and in order to get to the People Mover, I had to walk through the Greektown casino (I didn't gamble). And guess what? I got carded. So I guess in the end, yesterday was a wash, age wise.
OK, I should totally be working on the edits for my book, but I have about as much concentration as a puppy with ADD that just sucked down a butt load of pixie sticks right now (I like to create an image for my readers...you're welcome:), so I decided to blog instead. Especially because something popped into my head that I had all but forgotten...or maybe I tried to surpress.
The best thing about cycling in France in undoubtedly the patisseries found in each village, where I consume various gastronomic delights each day. Every time I ride into a new town at lunchtime I seek out the nearest shop and watch where all the locals buy their bread. I still cannot work out what exactly the French do with their baguettes; everyone seems to visit the patisserie twice a day and leave with hands full of bread. I guess I have a certain lack of creativity… at the moment my baguette meals involve dipping the bread into a vegemite jar – yum! It was while having such a meal outside the Somme Museum in Albert that Garry and Dianne took pity on me and kindly bought me lunch. I needed the energy too after going off road along La Somme on a dirt track later in the day.
trying to be better,
Children are privately coached in India before kindergarten admissions. Hagwons or private, after hours ‘cram schools’ have become the focus of government ire in South Korea, with President Lee Myung-bak declaring “one-size-fits-all government-led uniform curriculums and an education system that is locked only onto the college-entrance examination are not acceptable.”
Eric Holder relied on wildly inaccurate and biased news reports, and then went out and made several wildly inaccurate and biased statements to the press.
OK so it's a dining room table but the dining room is full of my crafty stuff so to me it qualifies as a craft room. Gone are the days of tidying up my craft stuff after a session - so that I can go to bed - now now Mrs Sugar no smutty remarks thank you!!!
5, 1. A translation is found in Deussen’s Sechzig Upanishads des Veda,
those who have made a covenant with me
Level 4: MP Cost: 24, Damage: 304%, Attacks up to 6 enemies.
Stickles: Star Dust
However, if I’m being honest with myself, I’d much rather be with the Hawaiians on this and ‘hang loose’ – or to quote my sister, the infinitely wise starlet and ‘calm the f**k down.’ Therefore, when things of a tough, challenging nature come up, whether that’s a fight with said starlet, a stressful moment in work, or the frustration I feel at a horrendous news story, then I’m going to be handing it over. Be warned this isn’t a quick fix to a situation and I reckon it’s a lifelong practice, but it is so worth it!
And it was so.
Thanx and take care,
Of course, most record label agreements would state that the works at issue are works for hire. The golden nugget lies in the fact that saying something doesn’t make it so. (A common theme in copyright lately.) The Guide gives a great analysis of the work for hire doctrine, complete with Congressional drama and RIAA trickery. Check it out.
How crazy is it that it's already May? It scares me how fast time passes, especially this Spring semester. Nonetheless, there are many things I'm looking forward to this summer. I can't wait to share them with you.
Comment on my posts (just once each) U-X (Tuesday through Friday) – one point
It would be overstated to suggest that the Volt is a "loss leader" in the traditional sense, or that the Plymouth convertible was a "bait and switch" tactic. Still, there are tantalizing points of similarity. In the auto industry as well,the interrelationship among the mark, the brand and the product are at once both more and less than that which meets the eye.
Me: We can't keep driving up and down the streets of random neighborhoods. If we do, someone is going to call the police and you know I don't look good in orange.
Lord Bingham said, in brief that; the offence is complete when the message is sent (no proof of receipt required) [at para.8] – but, more critical that the intention was to “prohibit the use of a service provided and funded by the public for the benefit of the public for the transmission of communications which contravene the basic standards of our society.”
This morning while I was at the grocery store picking up some laundry detergent and 2% milk for the kids, I grabbed myself a carton of skim milk.
7. You can volunteer anywhere you want. No supervisor is going to harangue you because you’re doing it for free in the first place.
Another hour goes by. The sun begins to set. Your muscles are aching to be able to drop the rock. But you refuse to give in. You’re committed to holding up your part of what you promised. Besides, your friend said he’d make it up to you. You aren’t sure what that means, but it must be something good. Thirty minutes later a car pulls up in the driveway. Someone you don’t know is driving. This person walks over and informs you that your friend has been delayed. “Would you mind holding the rock for just a little while longer?” he asks.
Infuriatingly, most of the entries aren’t dated – although the overall header relates mainly to 2003-4. But there can be no doubt that this is a hacked mobile phone message from Royals staying at their favourite Kenyan getaway between 1998 and 2001 – most likely to Princes William or Harry – between ten and thirteen years ago.
Coffey and crew create a swampy sound to complement Williams’ vocals. This musical backdrop is a perfect fit for this collection of songs.
- soft yellow paper straws
The Rt is Faux Metal BG and a collaged image with highlights in a Sakura Gelly Roll pen. I added some gold around the edge using Gold embossing powder.
She climbed up on bed, and traced her fingers along my neck and over my breasts. She gave it a slight squeeze and I inhaled softly. Her warmth, her kiss, her touch. It was perfect. ”I love you,” she whispered into my ear and licked it with her tongue. The wet, slippery sound sent shivers down my spine. Her hand reached down and I felt her warmth as she rubbed my cold, wet skin making me release another flow of wetness. The pleasure it gave me was immense.
Suddenly you realize murder is at your elbow! - and there's no way out!
the glory of God its end. It should fill
all Lurk and Loom and Lust,
That by itself is not enough to ground a plane, because the fuel can be measured manually. But this led to several problems.
The interior is chockablock with storage nooks and cubbies, plus no less than four beverage holders. It has supportive seats, and while visibility to the front and sides is good, like pretty much all new cars visibility to the rear is poor. Well, by 2014 there will be a rear-view camera.
Russ: “There are things that spring naturally to the tongue, such as ‘great’ becoming ‘girt’. Also when I was growing up in Pennsylvania the auxiliary verb was often thrown over the side, so you’d say ‘I done this’ or ‘I gone there’.”
My goal is to finish the race injury free........hoping I can look good in the process as well.
I want this additional section in my brain. Where do I get one? Can you buy iBrain attachments? I wouldn't mind an extra memory card for my brain either. It would be so convenient for multitasking and I'd get so much more done in my too-short 24 hour day.
I'm much too tired to watch TV
Helena had her revenge, she didn’t want to play nice
I use oils for calming, oils for headaches, oils and scents for healing. Oils for Energy….and you know what, as my children become more in tune with them selves, they ask for them. My two year old can go pick up a vial with Germanium, Lavender, and clove and know, this one makes her ear aches go away….and the tea tree heals her rashes….I am just saying, don’t knock something until you have tried it…
My Review: About a decade ago, The Sword of Truth novels were top sellers at the college bookstore where I worked. So, when I found a special edition of Wizard's First Rule, the first book in the series, I purchased it, shelved it, and promptly forgot I owned it. Then, a few years ago, ABC produced a TV show called Legend of the Seeker that was based on The Sword of Truth series. Now, normally I’m one of those people who likes to read the books before watching the television version, but in this instance I made an exception. You see, the male lead, Richard Cypher, was hot. Go ahead. Google him if you don't believe me.
And while the almost constant stream of protest marches can be a tad annoying, you have to admire the average French person's fervent belief that taking to the streets is an effective way to have their voice heard. You may not like the fact that your Vespa ride across the city is interrupted by yet another bunch of chanting refuseniks, but you respect the attachment to and belief in democracy that spurs them on.
Luke 1:38
But as far as we know, "PIC Sports Line" is not a daily show, and airs only on Mondays (a fact confirmed by the promo, which told listeners to tune in for the show on Monday nights).
3 Tbls. chopped fresh coriander.
While on the Internet, your copyrights and trademarks are still protected, they are especially vulnerable. It is important, that as you develop a web strategy and presence, you speak with an attorney who has expertise in this field. A few short meetings now could save money and heartache in the end when someone tries to trade on your company’s good name or steal its intellectual property.
The messed up part... it was not even the last two pieces of bread!
An icon of the labor movement, Mother Jones: Raising Cain and Consciousness, is the subject of a biography by Simon Cordery ($21.95, University of New Mexico Press, softcover). Mary Harris was born into a family of Irish radicals in 1837. Like thousands of others, the Irish potato famine forced them to immigrate to Canada. She married George Jones and settled with him Memphis, only to lose him and their four children to a yellow fever epidemic in 1867. She then lost her dressmaking business to the great Chicago fire in 1871. She found a home in the emerging labor movement after that, crisscrossing the nation to be an organizer. By all accounts she was a force to be reckoned with and in time she gained a national reputation in mines, factories, and workshops across the nation. There’s even a magazine named after her these days. If you have heard of her but never knew how she gained her reputation, this book will prove of interest as part of America’s history.
I've decided to start answering all of his questions with the same question in response. "Well, what do you think you should do?" And then critiquing his responses. Throw that passive/aggressive bullsnap right back in his face and make him decide for himself.
Australian money, however, holds value. Although I still have no idea how a small piece of plastic can be worth $100, at least our gold reserves match with the physical money printed.
Grace Cheval & Dylan Moore
So, I have this idea for a short story. It's basically a father discovering that his son has started playing a new and involved game. In an effort to be a better parent, he decides to start playing himself... and becomes the first adult to discover that some of the more wildly fanciful elements that his son has told him about (talking game-pieces, otherworldly battles, etc.) are true.
They both turned off their headlights when I got to the end of the first field. The moon gave me just enough light to see the remaining corn stalks I had to jump.
By making such comments Naik is clearly guilty of shirk, or the sin of associating partners with Allah, for ascribing some of Allah’s names and attributes to true prophets like Moses and also to the false prophet Muhammad, thereby elevating them to the level of divinity.
Buller won't get out of the van. He has been clinging to his Colorado river rock on the dashboard of our van since we returned. Seems he misses Denmark, and he misses you Sabin. Buller wants to come home. Although it is a strange time for a robin to fly North (most are gone for the winter now) we are wondering if Early is ready to fly the coop too?
The Nightmare Man. Series 4, episode 1.
Reader, let me talk to you about this subject. Believe me it is one of the deepest importance. This is no mere question of controversy. This is not one of those points on which men may agree to differ, and feel that differences will not shut them out of heaven. A man must be right on this subject, or he is lost forever. Heaven or hell, happiness or misery, life or death, blessing or cursing in the last day,—all hinges on the answer to this question, “What do you think about the cross of Christ?”
2. …
First, a few disclaimers: I'm not an accountant. I'm not a publican. I'm not a cellar technician. I'm not a lawyer. There's a whole heap of things that I'm not.
Now where to start?
Hehehe, I'm blogging early because I'm gonna take my nap now. My nap can be very longggg. Maybe till morning? Heehehe, who knowwwssss.. Byeee!
- She talks all the time! She is putting together sentences and saying new words every day. She loves animals and making all the animal sounds.
There are a few Beastie classics that get heavy airplay during the roughly 8 hours I spend in my car during the week (notably the palliative Namasté ). But Paul’s Boutique is an album I hadn’t listened to in years. I’m glad I got to take a trip down memory lane and revisit this timeless classic.
PS. In order to level-out the karma, I have been asked to tell you that on the 11th June, from 1.30 to 4pm, Drolma Buddhist Centre is hosting an open day in Dogsthorpe, Peterborough.
Several attempts at locating my phone and one full-on search and rescue mission later, my phone was found between the couch cushions, which coincidentally seems to be its favorite place to hide. With all of the running around I’ve been doing lately, spending 20 minutes looking for my phone before I can get my kiddos to baseball practice or an afterschool event is not an option.
Schizopolis
happy happy weekend!
and I will be out in California setting up my table for the Halloween and Vine show on Saturday, Sept. 24th. Just the thought of this is making me a bit nervous for a couple of reasons.
1360 **D-XI/5/2000. “Tocqueville on the Roads to Equality: Is It the Same No Matter How You Get There?” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Lodge, East Troy, Wisconsin. (Incorporated in Item C-2003(1), above, pp. 532-45.)
Promise lived the life of Riley here on the farm, she was an Alpha mare who got along with everyone. She loved "cookies" ( horse treats, esp the peppermint ones) All I had to do was call for her saying Promise, want a cookie? and she could be at the end of our 6 acres and she would come a runnin... it was so delightful to watch her get her "groove on" and do that beautiful floaty trot Arabians in all their glory are so good at doing. Her tail flung over her back, hocks and knees pistoning, neck proudly arched... majestic to watch.... spellbinding. Promise had her own winter blanket, and the past couple of years has loved when I headed outside with her blanket to cover her for the winter. I remember one night coming home to do chores and Promise was standing so still, I couldn't figure out why until I got near her, since it was dark I couldn't see that she had her back legs wrapped in wire, she could have panicked but she didn't, she waited for me to quietly untangle her legs from that mess of wire.
Out: 1st January 2011, UK
I can move move move any mountain
08-03 Montreal, Quebec – Osheaga Festival
I believe I have amply established that if you look at the left, you look at the heart of evil and the bottom “whale-crap” level of depravity as set forth by the Word of God in Romans chapter one.
Memory:1 GB RAM
See, he told me I needed an MRI and a spinal tap, and probably a medication that would reduce the optic nerve swelling while I lose the weight. I scheduled the MRI, but when I filled out the paperwork, I saw that they won't bill for deductible/co-pay. I called to verify. They wanted $658 at the time of my appointment. Sorry, please cancel my appointment, I can't do that. The fantastic person on the other end hung up on me. BEYOND ignorant and rude. I won't be going there for anything. (I'm bitter, can you tell?)
I hope that's wetted you appetite. They really are beautiful stamps to play with and very versatile as you can see. There are a lot of separate images that build up into any scenes your imagination can create. I've just coloured some with promarkers and of course the messy distress inks had an outing too.
I won’t be sitting on my couch, watching tv-aside from late night episodes of Sex and the City and The Nanny (brilliant shows.) And I will be eating three times the amount of fruit I am eating now. Those are my…promises of sorts to myself, and to whoever is reading this now. Those aren’t even the big changes, the big change is yet to come but-it will come-and when it does, I’ll let you all know exactly what it is, narration and pictures and all.
A-aye-aye .......
Isn't this just another boring article illustrating the left's enduring fetish about Nazis? The Nazi Party and its acolytes were utterly destroyed over 65 years ago and its leading lights were killed or imprisoned. Either way Nazism was totally discredited as a creed while the architects of the left's monstrous (and in many ways greater) crimes suffered no such fate. Yet in the best traditions of Joseph Mccarthy, the UK left would have you believe that there are closet Nazis everywhere....in, under and on the bed. It's utter self-serving b******s which enables them to shift attention from the crimes committed by the left.
Alexandra Gibson, Martha McLorinan (alto)
Taking responsibility and making personal adjustment would be ridiculous, right? These “surprised” investment gamblers are like pregnant women who act mystified when “suddenly” their water breaks. “Who knew? I was confident that this company was doing fine, and then they filed bankruptcy. Who is to BLAME for this shocking development… which, by the way, was obviously unpredictable (and which I may have been explicitly warned about for several years now)?”
I decided to check out the shoot on the day and was basically just a general assistant. I don’t know how she did it, but Jade managed to find the most perfect clothes and accessories for her ”Mermaid Out of Water” concept. Mostly all from second-hand stores! (Yes, we love that). My particular favourites were the shimmering gold skirt, the perlemoen shell bra, and the big blue goggles. The model, Nicky Fraser, was also unbelievably perfect for the mermaid role, with her wiry, curly hair and long slender physique, she was stunning!
We pass by what appears to be an enclosed training area. Through the plate-glass window, we can see a man-sized dummy. Suddenly, a blur of brown fur streaks across the room, moving so fast we can barely make it out. It bounces off the walls, does a backflip and then a brief, ever-so-fast glint of metal flashes. The head of the dummy pops off, sliced cleanly at the shoulders. And even before the ball of brown actually lands, another glint of metal and THUNK. The dismembered dummy head is speared onto the opposite wall by a giant, 8 inch combat knife. The ball of fur turns towards us. All we see are two crazy eyes and two giant teeth.
Creating an emotional tie between the product or service your company sells and your client or consumer, seems to be a mutually beneficial practice for corporations and charitable entities. Will this marketing trend towards Sustainability and Cause Marketing continue? If companies truly commit to incorporating Sustainability and/or Cause Marketing in their marketing strategies, and these efforts result in client or customer allegiance and brand preference, my opinion is that it’s likely we’ll see these marketing trends become standard practices.
Ancient societies around the world used honey as an energy food. It has evolved as a unique and powerful remedy for a wide variety of complaints.
- Stalking the mailman for John's social security number (to file taxes) and our updated approval from USCIS (so we can bring M home)
Being Jewish, Kugel finds himself in a bind. The tattoo on her arm confirms that the woman is indeed a Holocaust survivor, even if she isn’t Anne Frank. Will Kugel be the man to be identified as the Jew who threw a survivor out of his house? And what if the woman really is Anne Frank?
Does their coaching align exactly with what your core values and culture are all about??
3. Pare the potatoes and onions and dice them. Add them, plus the carrots, green peppers, cabbage, tomato puree, corn, red pepper, okra, parsley, lima beans, celery, and bourbon, to the meat and stock. Allow the stew to simmer until very thick about 6 hours.
Again, to take a flash photo, I went to a place that was a little darker (but not dark, I took this photo around noon in summer, so you can imagine, no dark places) and my pupils are bigger and you can practically only see the lens design, not my eye color again. I think the blending is amazing in this series and Green and Gray ones would look so dramatic and amazing, yet blend really great on dark eyes!!! I like how they turn up the green in my eyes and make the size bigger! Also very comfortable!
These thoughts are never over. They aren’t. It is a thought that is continuous, unfortunately, and all we can ever ask for is a change of weather.
Alright, let's end on some really great updates!
Since also I have so far gone inverse, from the gestural deep into the text. As deep as the seam will let me.
If you are in the energy or compliance fields I hope that you can attend as we explore some of the above issues and many others. Anyone signing up through my site receives a discount. To register, simply book online, call +44 (0)20 7036 1300 or email enquire@iqpc.co.uk. Please quote ‘TomFox’ when registering to claim the discount.
We wrapped up at the bandstand, a big "Hey, that's our show, we'll be going to more breweries, bars, and festivals, watch for us, I'm gonna go blog now" and a big wet kiss for craft brewing and the folks who love it. Then Mike got his laptop from the car so we could get some shots of me typing away, and...well, I promised I'd blog about it, so I'm blogging. And the show...will be on air soon. More about that shortly. Cheers!
“Look, I just got out of a long-term relationship and I kind of need to slut it up for a while.”
For the burgers (modified to give the beef a little more kick):
4. Add the flour mixture to the banana mixture and stir just until blended.
he would learn a thing or two after hearing me read it.
And while we're on the subject of comments on my blog, I realize that I forgot to choose a winner for the Technique Junkies CD #8 at the end of October. Better late than never, I just shook my iPhone for a random number and the winner is #10, Donelda.
in case you trip up
Let’s talk a bit about you Suzan. What made you want to get into the industry in the first place?
Nothing takes worse of a beating in presidential elections than do facts and figures. We know that (a) our employment levels have not recovered to their pre-recession levels and (b) job losses in this recession are far worse than in any post-war recession.
Having satisfied themselves that once again, no one in the buying public could possibly connect that commercial to any actual product, the execs at Fallon McElligott gave themselves enormous holiday bonuses and fellated each other until they felt straight enough to face their wives.
What’s that? You’re not going to a festival? You haven’t been asked?
From 1960 to 1996, Guatemala has lived in the terror of civil war. The 36-year conflict has produced: 150.000 killed, 50.000 disappeared, 1.000000 refugees, 200.000 orphans, 40.000 widows, hundreds of villages destroyed.
Me: No, she isn't.
There is this website, who offer support for people with the condition or concerned about it. It has information about the infection and the test and treatment. It dispels a LOAD of myths with facts like GBS is not a sexually transmitted disease and a mother or father can carry it rather happily without ever knowing or ever being treated for it so it is completely innocently passed on to the baby. Simply giving the mother antibiotics in labour can stop the illness from being passed to the baby being born.
Thanks for reading, I'll be back later this week!
Critic’s Score: 5.7
Is worth a lifetime
To me, a g-tube is a last resort, although I know it's not supposed to be. It's just hard, knowing that as much effort as I put forth, it's not enough. It's heartbreaking, really.
The act of buying (or building) a house, which renders the subject financially impotent for an indefinite period of time.
* The series will run through the month of May.
Survey shows 41% of secular Israelis support municipal religious leaders' call not to rent apartments to non-Jews, as do 64% and 88% of Israel's traditional and haredi Jews, respectively.
For our first grocery trip since getting back, I wasn’t tempted while walking past the meat. When I saw the bacon next to the eggs, instead of thinking yumm, I thought about the slaughterhouse worker who beat the squealing pig, cut its snout off, and rubbed salt on it because he was angry. When walking past the rotisserie chickens I thought about the hormones injected in them and the overcrowded cages they live in and how their beaks are cut off.
And she pulls of the short haircut that I wish I could!
And the sentiment is from Close To My Heart -- Card Chatter Birthday!
of you have read the book "Fifty Shades of Grey"
He’s a gentleman. He’ll open doors for you, make sure you’re seated comfortably, carry heavy things for you, and generally go out of his way to put YOUR needs before his own.
Stars: Zachary Quinto, Kevin Spacey, Paul Bettany, Jeremy Irons, Simon Baker, Demi Moore, Aasif Mandvi, Mary McDonnell, Penn Badgley, and Stanley Tucci
Because Africa as a whole has dealt with 50 years of banging its head against a brick wall. Same as in my Mum's Ireland where post-liberation Irish voted in extremism to have the Catholic Church rule the Irish state and to cut off their nose to spite their face. By refusing to do business there 500 year oppressive Colonisers, the Brits. While understandable, led to 70 YEARS OF HARDSHIP. Of Irish being forced to leave Ireland to move to Britain. Same story as Africa. And same story as to why African immigrants into South Africa vote against the new extremist ANC, who've forgotten the Freedom Charter.
Elli is a little skeptical of Shea, but he knows that they were meant to be together, and he needed her in his life. But Elli just doesn’t understand what Shea could see in her. She is overweight, loud, and not even that pretty, so why would someone so gorgeous and so amazing want to be with her? It seemed that no matter how hard she tried to shake Shea off, he wasn’t going anywhere, and for the first time Elli didn’t feel alone.
Update: Tags added.
Easter is a vision of what your church can become. Our former Sr. Pastor, Gary York, used to say, "if you can hit it, you can average it". I think that's true. If people will come to church on Easter, then you just have to figure out what might minister to that group the other 51 weeks of the year. I have prayed this morning that God would grow us into the church we saw yesterday. It is also a great way to assess possible limitations, programmatic challenges, staffing/volunteer needs/parking etc.... If God would make yesterday's service a normal Sunday what would you have to do grow into for that to happen?
I would remove half the screws from the bathroom fixtures & move the toothbrush holder to the backdoor, placing it right on the ground by Fido's bowl.
Did you see that? See what he did there? He acknowledged that I am his mom and that I am supposed to love him just like every other mom in the world.
more from my days?
The dreams we have as children
resurrect the passed on? Can a song, trumpeted,
Hey guys. THANK YOU for all the congrats on hitting the NYT Bestseller list!!!! A lot of you have been hanging out here from the beginning, and you helped my book get there. So thank you very, very much.
It's alright to slow down. In fact, it feels . . . amazing.
10 October 1997
Do you recall the media kerfuffle about Sarah Palin’s “crossshairs” and how they blamed her (and the Tea Party) for the shooting of Gabrielle Giffords (which was actually done by an extreme leftist).
Why not just send one, to let our defence forces know that we care about them.
Interesting Discovery
When my oldest was 3, I told a group of older homeschooling moms that we were going to have a CM homeschool. They laughed at me! They told me I'd soon give it up because it would be too hard, primarily because at the time there was not a curriculum available (or at least not well known) that used CM's methods. *Now* we run into a different problem--there are so many choices that it becomes confusing. What *is* a CM education?
Razor Blade Alley
But still, like dust, I'll rise.
"I would encourage all Catholics to apply critical thinking to this issue."
Yes, in 2007 the girls all wore sundresses and hats and the boys wore thrift store suits. Good times. I want to go back to the Kentucky Derby next year, it is amazingly fun. In fact, everyone should go to the Derby at least once in their lifetime.
http://www.hulu.com/tiger-and-bunny Tiger & Bunny is a new show that is being simulcast on Hulu - aka subtitled and available for streaming just hours after it airs in Japan. This show is amazing! It takes place in a future city where super heroes are part of a super popular reality TV series and earn points for the things they do, while being sponsored by major companies. The animation is stunning, the pace is fast, and I am ready to order the toys. I think fans of western comics could really appreciate this show even if they don't like anime.
I struggled, but I finished. ‘Luctor et emergo,’ goes our national motto (I struggle and emerge). I started sending the manuscript around. I was lucky to be introduced to a number of fine agents by fellow writers. Every single one of them wrote me back a personal letter, as did some agents to whom I sent it to unsolicited. Thank you to them all! But alas, no bidding war emerged.
UM... HOLY SHNAZBALLS. This beefcake of a massage therapist is the one giving me a light bulb moment cause when she said that my exact thoughts were..
I found this a pleasant enough read of the faux time-travel sort (there's no point in expecting historical accuracy), and the cat-loving girl suffering through the blahs of sixth and seventh grade would probably enjoy it a lot more.
I can’t believe I haven’t written about my El Nido trip! You see, my family spent Christmas break at El Nido, and we’re glad we did because the place is testament to how beautiful The Philippines is.
* Multiple recipes are permitted (although only one submission will be counted towards the random drawing/s).
The plum thicket back there has finally been cut and cultivated by them to afford them cover and back doors.
a hover of crows,
In the music I hear- You whisper to me…
Once the girl is labeled an Eskimo (more precisely, a native of slightly less ferocious Labrador), her strangeness dissipates and her assimilation takes on greater value.Seems like 2012 is going to be... hot? Weird? Both? ("... her assimilation takes on greater value.") Maybe I need more exciting bedside reading.
Directed by Melina Mastoukas, who directed Rude Boy, Hard, Gangster 101, as well as Beyonce‘s 50/60′s pin-up house-wife-come-feminist inspired Why Don’t You Love Me.
The bourbon boys should not switch between that and beers. Nor should anyone be permitted to ‘upsize’ outside of their shout. You can’t be buying pots for your mates and then decide “I might just have a quick Flaming Lamborghini, actually” when someone else is buying. The Shout works because you don’t even need to ask what the others want, just a quick nod and a point to indicate that you are ’up’. You may sit out of a particular round of The Shout without bringing social disrepute upon your family name – as long as you don’t sit out your shout. The other exception to The Shout guidelines is that it is perfectly reasonable and permissible to exclude any member who wants to drink Pimms, Pernod, Campari or Vodka Cruisers. Unless they are girls. They can drink poofy drinks, but not in The Shout.
Does this mean that dental x rays cause cancer? No. This study was looking at an association, not cause and effect, relationship between reported dental x rays and a certain type of non-malignant brain tumor. It merely brings up the possibility that the two could be linked and encourages caution in minimizing radiation.
Perhaps I’m a” strong independent woman” after all, or just a women trying to make sense of the world around her before she falls down the rabbit hole again.
We borrowed a house in a small town outside of Reykjavik called Vogar à Vatnsleysuströnd for five days where we recorded our album. We had one microphone and a computer and just pressed the red button. It was not professional at all but that was never the intention anyway, nevertheless we
Just.
"You sleep in the clock?"
Put the chicken in a large pot and add the stock. If the liquid doesn't quite cover the bird, top it up with water from the kettle. Bring to a boil. Lower the heat and simmer, partially covered. Cook gently for 40-ish minutes (I like my chicken slow-cooked and tender, but be careful: if you let it go too long it will become stringy and mealy. Yuck). Remove the chicken from the pot to a platter.
Olivia got in the shower and turned it on. The water was a bit cold but boy did it sure feel refreshing. She stood there for a couple of minutes and let the water just run over her body, the drops running off her long black hair and down her back. Oh, did it feel good.
There undoubtedly was some element of chauvinism in the works of Marx and Engels, which was inevitable in the times that they were writing. It is also true that Marx and Engels themselves concluded that they had overstated the revolutionary potential of the times. In fact, as they were later to state, in 1848, Britain was the only country where capitalism was dominant, and, as they believed that socialism was impossible without capitalism first developing and socialising the productive forces, a socialist revolution was clearly impossible in 1848.
We found our way to the pump house, where the Roman Baths are.
So, I am ready and exited to get back to class! Tomorrow I will introduce "Go Fish--Parts of Speech Edition". I think the students will love it! It is my original idea, so if you're interested, I have placed it on my "Free Printables" page.
Chock full of cupcakey goodness and ready to satisfy
Does this mean we are on a terrifying downward spiral, into an abyss of accelerating degeneracy and dysfunction, with no end in sight? No it does not. What it means is that the boundaries are being pushed to ever increasing levels of insanity, until a cosmic global reaction takes place. Portions of this are taking place at this very moment. That portion of the awakening populations are pushing back and will soon be joined by a much larger mass of their fellows, as conditions make their lives more and more unlivable and more and more dire. It is a matter of time and we are in that time frame.
So it seems that Conservatives, in comparison, just don't care. About people. Or maybe we do. After all, who says that caring about society, or people in society, means interfering with them? Is it intention that counts? or the results?
published the counter-weighted space elevator concept known today, with a midway station conveniently located at GEO, and everything held suspended by tension, rather than compression. Subsequently, amid all the excitement over rockets, most in the west remained ignorant of the concept...
there would have to be many arks,
Next to Murg was an empty seat. Hadn't Bleek been sitting there? Scrunge craned his neck but couldn't see her. This was worrying. After all, he didn't like losing track of the nasty Drangathian. He preferred to be able to keep out of her way.
In the midst of all my knitting projects (Gzilla's 2009 Christmas sweater... still about 60% done... my "Ireland Cardigan" isn't finished... and I'm making a comfort shawl for my sister out of the yarn I purchased for her baby blanket. I'm dying it first, since I don't think she wants a PEACH shawl) I am taking on another one that needs to be finished SOON.
I sit idling for a while.
1And Job made answer and said,
Next I’m going to detour off the track for a bit and begin to examine the field events.
Through this painful night
Introducing You To The Pioneers
When The Boy woke up he was REALLY hot. I never take a temperature on a kid unless it lasts more than a day, or they are so hot they can’t move. I just give them something for it. So now, I am in the house with a hot kid and a smelly dog. I REALLY am starting to wonder if having the perfect bunny is going to make up for this. I’m a mess. I can’t even decide what I want for dinner.
Also, Olivier is from Ohio but speaks in a drifty, Britishy accent. People on Twitter were ragging on him about it, but I'm as ok with fake accents as I am with died hair.
Here are just three of the many projects that caught my eye this week:
Pictures.
- Hall & Oates, The Roots, Holy Ghost! Preservation Hall Jazz Band to play at Brooklyn's GoogaMooga Festival. Carroll Gardens Patch
Today’s Question for Reflection:
GO BACK GO BACK GO BACK.
Cheaper than hair dye/going to a salon, no chemicals
just keep awaiting for your next eruption
e. A lobster costume to celebrate her heritage.
Light the color of oyster shells seeped into the small cell, the eastern light of a Vietnamese dawn hitting the slopes of the Dãy Trường Sơn. Rainer stopped, eggshell in hand, watching the little window grow brighter. The hot plate at the end of the counter hissed softly. Out of the corner of his eye, he saw the pale blue gas ring capering like a small spirit under the battered aluminum tea kettle perched on the burner. Spirits. Ghosts. He struggled to recall what the natives called them. Ma? Bong ma? The words slipped away like fish in the river.
The deadline to apply is 11:59 pm PST, May 1st, 2011. Applicants will be notified by May 3rd, 2011 via email. Should the applicant need to create a project using one of our images for further consideration, we will let you know that once we receive your project samples.
Next time you are in Church or driving in the car or walking in the mall and your mind starts to wandering and people watching; Stop and think. We do believe in Jesus who was scarred by a crown of thorns and pierced for us – Jesus loves us just as much as He loves them. By His wounds, all prejudice, judgment, narrow-mindedness and intolerance are gone. His Peace was given to us through His punishment. We are all held in His arms – including the different strokes for different folks. When we call out to Him, the original “pierced” Son, heals us – all.
“Who is it?” calls one of the nuns.
Staley’s behaviour subsequently deteriorated and he exhibited psychotic, bizarre and on occasions, hostile behaviour. He also reported hallucinations, paralysis and exhibited delusional thinking. Staley was hospitalised ten times in total and diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia and anti-social personality type. During this period, Staley also suffered from depression and was placed on suicide precautions. Staley was most recently hospitalised for approximately 19 months from November 28, 2002 to June 17, 2004.
I like somebody’s dad
My icing is something that needs to be improved upon - but I basically strived to make a bone shape in each arm and leg - an anchor like piping for the ribs, and then the skull. My icing could have used a bit more sugar to thicken as it spread a bit after I piped it - but I got the hang of icing after a while. The first few were really creepy looking - but hey - they are for Halloween!
Aside from that, there’s the whole ebooks thing which will hopefully be a positive game-changer for libraries, rather than a reason to no longer have them. We’re hoping to start providing ebooks in my school next year through Overdrive, and it would be great to make some connections with other librarians, and find out what ebooks models they think will work in the long term.
“educational apartheid,”
I do not know the name of the film, but I have seen it in a collection of shorts called Wholphin. I'd watch these with my mother because we're both into odd and short. This is a part of one of those films. It doesn't start with the beginning, so I'm not sure what we've missed, but with these kind of things, you can pretty much pick up at any point and have the same level of understanding/confusion.
The tracker rolled over and pushed his dead companion away in disgust. Most of the man’s head was missing. Brains and blood had spattered everywhere. The second of the two deserters was writhing in pain a few feet away. A quick look revealed that a chunk of his skull and jaw were missing. In the tracker’s opinion, the man didn’t have long. In the mean time … he could provide a necessary diversion.
Here’s a photo of the MP 622 in everyday service on the MP: http://www.rrpicturearchives.net/showPicture.aspx?id=1174738
Notes: I've made this in the past using frozen broccoli and it was not a good result. Neither was it a good outcome when I doubled the batch. So I follow the exact measurements and it turns out great.
"Digga Digga Do" - The Asylum Street Spankers. I digga digga life. Yes I do. "You love me and I love you." Sounds about right. He's pretty goddamn amazing. But he has a tendency to get a big head, so I can't tell him that too much. Stop reading this, honey. I mean, you evil bastard.
So next time those seemingly vacant eyes roll over you, consider them. Look back with intent. Just stare at one eye, it’s impossible to look into both. And, when you see what looks like your reflection in that unflinching iris, remember that it’s not. It is what you look like in the mind’s eye of that goat. I don’t think there is reason for alarm, but I don’t think it wants to be your friend, either. It’s just a goat, putting off its tomorrows.
That's it for me today. I'm going to try and have the logistics for my next challenged worked out sometime next week. So come back and visit!
Use a pencil, dowel, or pen.
Claire has created some of the best sentiment sets...
We'll see how i do. Wish me luck with my goals.
am
In the poetry world longevity and a lasting contribution are always paramount. What we think now fades: tastes and expectations change; very often what is thought fifty, even one hundred, years henceforth (very often by critics and harvardisers, as Harry Clifton, newly appointed Irish Professor of Poetry coined it) is what fixes one writer above another; or conversely what resurrects a writer from ignominy. The view becomes more complete the further you stand away. Perhaps, in part, this may be one reason why the latest addition to the family tree of Irish modern anthologies is an edition from abroad.
And Karen sent me this beautifully carved typewriter stamp.
Scoop the chilled dough by tablespoonfuls onto prepared baking sheet. Bake for 12-13 minutes and let the cookies cool completely on the cookie sheet between batches.
Recently however I received this mailing:
Titanic’s story was told by the survivors who witnessed the tragedy first hand on a cold mid April night as they sat in the lifeboats hoping against hopes while they were forced to watch the lost of their loved ones. Every survivor who was on the lifeboat lost someone they loved. The stories conflicted from one survivor to another. Some witnesses said that the Titanic split into two before she went down while others said that it was intact as it vanished. But most of them told a familiar tale of the cries of all those dying men and women in the sea. As time passed by, the cries became faint and finally there was no sound left but complete silence.
Garnish with cheese and I used almond slivers for my portion and the roasted squash seeds for husband's plate. (The roasted squash seeds though nice to eat on their own, did not go well with the risotto). The reason for all the fuss is because we do not like pine nuts too much.
09 Do You Really Want To Hurt Me?
- The dogs scared the hell out of me when I was younger. In fact, that may be a deep psychological reason why I didn't like dogs then. Makes you think...
Warning of diplomatic consequences, Pakistan’s Foreign Ministry strongly condemned the attacks, the first since Parliament’s unanimous vote this month approving new guidelines for the country’s relationship with the United States. Some politicians said the drone strikes might set back already difficult negotiations over the reopening of vital NATO supply routes to Afghanistan that Pakistan blocked five months ago.
They make me laugh. Especially Trevin this morning.
Me: OMG we have been married FOREVER and we haven’t even taken it out of the boxes. It is STILL in your parents’ garage from when it was delivered!
Not that. But it is something I'm trying to feel satisfied about, something I want to let be an ending in the best narrative sense of the world. This blog was an important part of a narrative for me. It was the first blog I ever paid real serious attention to. It informed so very many of my opinions while I was a grad student. On things like this and this and this, just to name a few. It was through this blog that I met my first ever internet people in real life. And hey, remember when we did this? Ah, the times.
Something that I’ve toyed at while editing photographs is adding in some color to an otherwise black and white picture. I like the idea of someone’s eyes being drawn to a splash of color in a picture full of grey, black and white. It’s also not really hard to do lol which is a bonus. But I also believe that maybe it can be just a gimmick that helps people turn a boring picture into something a bit more artsy, as I did with this picture of the motercyle.
MASS DEATH IS “GOOD FOR THE ENVIRONMENT”
That's what he said. I was disappointed because I knew the power of this observation in the hands of countless blinkered theologians; its power to back up fundamentally stupid dogma of all sorts when they didn't have a clue what he was on about – rather like me at that time anyway. Not a blind clue that Einstein's vision of God wasn't that of a puppet-master but something vaster than the universe itself, which at least we now know isn't anything like what we can imagine. Much larger even than space, time, nothingness and any
Thank you for sending me The List by Joe Konrath. I liked the set-up for this novel a great deal--a detective investigation a murder finds that the victim shares the same enigmatic tattoo that he possesses. Unfortunately, I just didn't think the rest of the novel could sustain that sense of eerie anticipation. The reason for the tattoos, that all participants were part of a secret government cloning experiment, just seemed a little too familiar, and the constant joking, while witty at times, also eroded the tension and sense of menace. I appreciate the look and hope another editor feels differently. Bantam Dell Publishing Group
Or go not.
The Wild West scene started at around 4:40pm Thursday, when a young mom's car was hijacked while she was pulled up in front of her children's nursery school in the leafy Pretoria suburb of Pierre van Ryneveld.
The workshop will be a 'Field to Studio' based class. We'll spend about two days in the field making preparatory studies and taking photos, and then take all of that information back into the studio,for three days, to design and work up larger paintings. During the week I will demonstrate my entire process for using the studies from Nature to create a more complex, considered and larger painting in the studio. I encourage you to bring along a laptop and camera to view any reference sources to use in addition to your field studies. The link to the school below will take you to a page of workshop information. You can scroll down to see the description and registration information for my class. I'd love to work with you there if you think it's something that would be of interest.
Obesity is obvious. Obesity levels are higher now than ever before. One-third of Americans are obese and another third are overweight. Eating a low fat diet only hurts your health. Our bodies need natural, good fats.
The objective was to capture the Dardanelles and Constantinople, opening the gateway to the Bosphorus and the Black Sea for the allied navies.
Parents fight many personal and emotional demons when raising a child on the spectrum. Simply saying “Well, just do this and just do that” is easier said than done. It’s good to understand that each person always does their very best with what they know and what resources are available to them. Offer help before you offer judgement.
1/4 cup Worcestershire sauce
my weakness. Crave Him...not things of this world. Crave His word to fill my
Even trying to relive the dream in the shower didn't help. What do you mean, I'll have to imagine and write the ending? Oh, right. I'm a writer.
When these chemical changes have been made, the meat will have absorbed approximately 10% more water and salt from its original weight.
* Graduated from baby collar to big-girl collar
Due to personal 'Life Stuff,' we have decided to relieve ourselves of the pressure of posting every Friday. We are giving ourselves the freedom to post on an 'ad hoc' basis until such time as life decides to be a little more co-operative. We do plan to put postings up, but they will be random. For new readers, there's a years worth of material to check out on this blog - (links are in the left hand column) - with some interesting round the table discussions to keep you entertained between any new postings that we manage to cobble together before normal service is resumed.
They’re both miserable because they feel inadequate in the face of all the different responsibilities that are demanded of them.
Micheletto quizzes the nosey servant girl, who asks to be paid for her info, because it’s pretty juicy. This idiot girl is so dead.
In another 1993 study,Willett and another researcher looked at data from over 50,000 male health workers, and correlated meat eating with higher risks of prostate cancer.
"Why didn't you send it?" Arlan asked me. "I would have …
phantom pains
ISBN-13:
by wasted youth, and salads Greek,
For those not familiar with Apple Butter, it is similar to apple sauce but thicker and richer in flavour. What would you use it for? Well, here is a short list:
I can’t say everything went as it should have. The list of events that didn’t go as planned were noteworthy to say the least, but here is a brief overview: In Nainital a massage was interrupted by a man claiming to be my husband, in Delhi my friend lost consciousnesses in the middle of a busy market, another friend experienced a severe case of culture shock, the driver who took us to Agra was 40 minutes late and we missed two important sights, we endured rickshaw wars in Amristar and got ripped off buying shawls, loved Holi in Chandigarh while my Carol’s hair turned a permanent shade of pink and Annette suffered with a two day migraine, in Udaipur we never got our second car but still marveled at the calm lakes and marble palaces, and then Mumbai club life didn’t live up to our expectations and the driver wasted our morning trying to take us to expensive shops so he could get commission.
Julie: Penguin
“Don’t presume to know me and call me sweetheart.” Her eyes flashed and the color grew a darker green. “I won’t become one of your blood whores.”
Search high and low,
Update: 4/21 8:03 a.m. (Three days later…) Slow fermentation != Weak fermentation. I do not normally ferment this cold, so I guess I should expect it to behave differently than I am used to. Normally — at 67 °F, say — I would expect fermentation to be mostly done by now. Instead, I check it this morning and the trub is swirling like mad, the kreusen has filled the head space and the airlock, and the fermenter is sitting in a puddle of stale beer. I sanitized my blowoff tube and slowly removed the airlock. It hissed like mad for quite a little bit of time. I am guessing it was almost ready to blow. I cleaned it up this morning and it is happily blubbing away in the blowoff bottle.
Self-worth? Redemption? In a movie with Gary Busey, The Barbarian Brothers and topless waitresses? Yep. And Mr. T, too - can't forget him. Or Irene Cara as Irene Cara.
Hello friends
I calmly responded to my mother as if she were an unreasonable child throwing a temper tantrum, letting her know that this is what I had to do since she wouldn’t be honest with me. I could smell the wine on her breath over the phone, nearly 1,000 miles away and dismissed her ridiculously slurred speech by repeating to her that I needed to find out the truth. She slammed the phone down and hung up, as expected, and I preceded to go on with my day…. But first……
And, about those bad guys, I want you to think about how beautifully a diamond shines against a black background.
Patrick and I miss donating time to charities that are important to us. Yes, you can give money to thousands of good causes down here. However, as a cruiser you never get a chance to teach English at the orphanage every week and build up a relationship with the kids, or spend months helping to build houses, or even muck out the cages at the local dog pound once a week. If you are truly cruising, you are moving every few weeks. People who are living on a boat, staying in one place can do those things, but they aren't cruising. We miss making a meaningful committment to a good cause.
Immediately regretted it when the alarm went off, but hit snooze instead of sleep, so I got woken up again ten minutes later. I think Henry was awake from the first alarm, so it was pretty much time to get up regardless.
Will separate our love from hence we
That moment where you are in the car with your family and suddenly a song with some sexual content suddenly goes on and no one bothers to change the station. Errrr....arrrrghhhh....
Web site: www.rgbnetworks.com
Green Lantern #9 (DC Comics) This cover is notable for having almost nothing at all to do with the actual contents of comic beneath it, save for the fact that all three of the characters pictured do a appear within it (although Black Hand, whose giant head dominates most of the cover and whose MADNESS Green Lantern is DROWNING IN, only briefly cameos).
I first imported the mesh file. Unselected it is black. When we select the mesh it turns green.
In pursuit of that, I have been dipping into a book borrowed from my Dad - a translation into Spanish of a not-particularly-good English detective story. It hasn't been a good choice, except for one line.
There's a slight but considerable danger
I don’t want to. I want that fucker to go down in shame as the light-of-day shines on his/her indiscretions. I want them hauled out in a white jacket and taken to a padded cell.
This recipe is fairly easy and sure to impress. Make the bbq sauce the night before and let your chicken marinade in it. Save some of the sauce to brush on while you’re at the grill. The sweet and tangy flavour of the peach screams “It’s summer time!” I have made this for a nice dinner at home, and I’ve also brought it to barbeque at a park for a family picnic. It’s really not that difficult, and people seem to be impressed when I tell them I made the bbq sauce myself.
Marsi shares yet another one of her secrets today. What would we do without her?
Early on, the rain threatened to wash us to oblivion. But then it abated and we were able to get a full day’s work in. So it was very much like life: two steps forward, and one step back. But not necessarily in that order. What a day…
After the goal, Villa’s tails were up, while we allowed our heads to drop. Our front two looked off the pace and were isolated as our midfield dropped even deeper. Forwards and midfielders seemed to be on different wavelengths, with runs poorly timed or non-existent. Our wing play became less effective, our passing got worse and we were reduced to aimless punts that rarely found their target. For all that though we nearly got back on terms near half time when a good cross from Etherington was headed just over by Jon Walters.
bloody Methodists,
Hunter's siblings were born prematurely, with heart conditions, and spent several weeks in CHEO. The twins have not needed surgery, and are monitored at home. They are, for the most part, healthy. Jennifer considers herself very lucky to have CHEO so close to home. "I feel immensely happy and in huge gratitude to the people who every day save the lives of children."
The sacred assembles
Don't know if I can just choose one Tilda as my favorite, but I think she's in the running for it...LOL. Hey, how about you...do you have one very very very favorite Tilda?
The Beginning: The idea of Fountainhead Brewing started in early 2009. At the time, Michael Ojo was still early in his homebrewing experience and had ideas of starting a business. Over time he came to realize that opening a brewery was truly an extension of his pre-existing passion for food and beverage. "My good friend and I tossed around the idea of opening a brewery and from that idea grew Fountainhead. The original idea was to start a nanobrewery, but over time the idea and plans have grown to what will someday be a small-scale microbrewery," he explained.
On whatever the day,
Admit you want to be with someone like me
1984 twisted my thoughts; it got me thinking how far I will go for self-preservation, for loyalty, for freedom. Dystopia lovers (like me) out there will surely squeal in delight upon reading 1984. Oh, yes. Hopelessness is at the very core of it. Remember: Big Brother is watching you. *evil grin*
Bright Star
They do a disservice to the people of this nation by presuming that we are unable to understand the need to appease the Malays while safe-guarding the rights of the non-Malays.
The particle, until now, has existed only in theory — rigorous theory, first proposed by the English physicist Peter Higgs 40 years ago, but until now it’s never actually been detected. The Large Hadron Collider, the giant particle accelerator 17 miles in circumference, was built deep beneath the mountains on the French-Swiss border to send atoms crashing into each other at nearly the speed of light. It would be enough that if the particle actually exists, the LHC’s detectors would see evidence.
Now as you breathe-in envision Brandon, Jason, Juan and Peter
When the wind to blow
2 hold
In My Utmost for His Highest, Oswald Chambers (in his devotion for April 30th entitled ‘The Spontaneity of Love’) asserts that,
But the colors are what does it for me. And to all of you who think that wood panelling is out, i say to you, 'nay, NAY 'tis in'. Granted i'm the 70's girl, but i love some painted white or stripped and washed wood panelling any day. a la this one:
Share your pleasures, your pains, your setbacks, your gains. Who did you meet along the way that you found to be especially helpful or inspiring? Did you have a favorite blog post? Or a favorite series? Which blogs did you discover during April that you will be returning to in the future?
This would make a great Mother's Day gift. It's a book you can easily read in one sitting or you can just read a short 2-4 page chapter when you need a little motivation and reminder that being the mom although difficult at times is definitely worth it.
Anyone have suggestions for effectively studying for the GRE? I need to get a 500 in math, apparently they don’t look at the written scores.
In the postmodern relativist and secular context in which marriage appears increasingly to mean whatever one wants it to mean, today we celebrate what Christians have done for 2000 years and man has done for millennia: the union of a man and a woman. Not just any man, of course: Prince William’s royal lineage can be traced all the way back to King Alfred the Great. When he kneels at the 1000-year-old altar of Westminster Abbey, he does so as the representative of a British institution as ancient as the Church itself, under whose aegis he is joined in holy matrimony. This is not a fairytale: Prince William and Catherine Middleton do not enter the institution of marriage unadvisedly, lightly, or wantonly; but reverently, discreetly, soberly, and in the fear of God.
STEPH: How much research did you have to do?
The dog canvases on the wall on the left side of the bed were a nod to this young lady's love of dogs. The fashion canvases were chosen to give this room a more sophisticated feel.
Mystics may be drawn inward, but the oneness of the divine also embraces the outer world. When the eye of the heart is open all of creation reveals its divine nature; everything is seen as an expression, a manifestation of the One Being. Mystics are also involved in the demands of everyday life. One of Christianity’s most loved mystics, St. Teresa of Avila, worked tirelessly founding nunneries and looking after her nuns, while at the same time mystical prayer took her into ever deepening states of inner absorption, oneness and ecstasy. Mysticism does not mean to retire from life, but to live the unitive life. “God,” St. Teresa would say, “lives also among the pots and pans.”
Music: It’s Tubbs…what more do you need to know. A different track selection this time. But Tubbs in full flow, unstoppable.
Because of Mr Bull’s disability, officers had been in the habit of telling him when they were going out of the office. Some of them stopped doing so and ceased communicating with him.
Good actor, but I don’t like this series, nor the Golden Girls. I don’t like very old annoying women. There are a lot of other sitcoms and comedy series which are better.
"Oh, to grow, grow! To get older and taller," the little tree thought. "That is the most wonderful thing in this world."
Ben Hutchinson (B): It was Alfie’s idea. He had just read ‘Wind In The Willows’. The Gaoler’s Daughter represents escapism or something…
Ultimately, Max Payne works because it's a perfectly-executed action game with a thoroughly-developed central character and a knowing black humour about its own nature (without ever disappearing up its own posterior). Where the game falters is towards its end, when the thematic and character arcs are not brought to as satisfying a resolution as the revenge plot. Payne achieves some of his objectives, but is still left as a battered, traumatised person. It falls to Max Payne 2: The Fall of Max Payne to provide the resolution for Payne's character that is required.
The original US cover...
Citizen Times: And what is that perspective?
watching them grab onto to life as teens
Rose was the leader of our Girl Scout Troop from the time I was in Brownies to when I finally gave up being a Scout in High School. She and her cohorts put us through every imaginable craft and life-skills activity you can imagine. If you could make it out of paper, popcicle sticks, yarn, glue, wax, soap, or mud - we made it! Our troop fluxuated from 26 to 10 or so... This woman lead whoever would follow through camping, horseback riding, crossing swinging bridges (this was a re-occuring trial of note), thunderstorms, camp fires, haunted houses, parades, community performances, and volunteering. Oh man, did we volunteer.
I have been following a young fashion blogger now for a few weeks. Her blog is called Surely Sonsy, and I just love her self-assured style. Sonsy means buxom, comely, cheerful, good-natured and lucky. I like that adjective. She pulls together outfits with ease - and likely has a large closet to store all these pretty things! She certainly is sonsy!
Undress.
Beads and ear rings: Mandala_ pearl rain
What happened to women? Women are like moons that can have a sort of gravitational pull on everything around them, but now it is like they are planets spinning off from their orbits, non-directional and ineffective. One thing is women do not like other women, they are competitive and suspicious. I realize some women do have close relationships and that is good but most do not. I am Eve, mother of every single living, breathing person on this planet, and I don’t have close female friends, I want them, but somehow it just does not happen, I have acquaintances, but that is not the same.
The world we live in is a very dynamic place. Situations change momentarily; there is unpredictability and we constantly have to adapt to these. Autism struggles with these adaptations, the unpredictable and being flexible. These skills can be learnt through specified programmes, however without dynamic intelligence the world is overwhelming and scary.
Last night it was raining cats and dogs so I decided for supper a pot of warm, hearty soup was in order. I ended up trying out this new recipe for roasted asparagus soup and bringing it over to Mr. S.'s house where we opted against subjecting ourselves to Mother Nature's wrath ( I'm pretty sure the barrage of thunder and lightening were the deciding factor) and instead enjoy a night in watching movies with this furry beast...our favorite little third wheel. I mean, how can you resist this cute face?
wow! i almost forgot i had this blog! okay, not really. in fact, during all this time that i have not been blogging here, i've come across many inspiring things that i wanted to write about.
What problem
Rae & Christian (feat. The Pharcyde) - Ain't Nothing Like
A recent article posted in Shewood Time featured this gorgeous photo of Holly's fab cupcake case! Drooling yet? Tyler Texas, Congrats on having your own cupcake angel, Holly of Ganache!
Mesdan arches an eyebrow quizzically as he reads her latest message. “I wasn’t even here for that, Eliss. You’re being too impulsive-”
But there was no hope of concentrating on the books or their titles. She was outraged and tired and feeling completely lonesome and helpless. All she really wanted was to go to sleep but she was still too wound up from the day’s events.
Arriving at an odd hour, in a lull between lunch and the evening crowds, there were plenty of seats to choose from at the scrubbed pine tables. Drei Bier, bitte. Three Spezial Lagerbiers. €2.30 each. Lovely soft carbonation, light caramel and raisins and a waft of sweet smoke on the back. That does the job. Food. Kassler with a rather strong Sauerkraut and bread. Spot on. Spezial Märzen please. Plummy, more raisins, a nice toasty edge under the soft rauch notes. Nicer than the bottled version. Far too easy to drink. Spezial Ungespundetes, the only unsmoked beer they make? Remarkably fruity aroma, like a mix of bubblegum and pear drops. Comes across in the flavour too, like liquidised candy. Not so sure if I like it, but it's hard to follow the smoked beers. If you're there, and it's on, go for this first. Spezial is a nice place, and it seems we spent a couple of hours here, shooting the breeze, catching up and sipping delicious beer. But I bet it's a lot better in the evening with a full crowd.
Now I am off for about a 20 mile move. It is raining where I am going so I may sneak in another 30 acres of straight no-till where I am. We did the worked ground yesterday which was good as it rained last night.
Few things can help an individual more than to place responsibility on him, and to let him know that you trust him. - Booker T. Washington
Hope you like it :) I dig this creepy b+w picture of Charlie infront of a mansion. It's a mix between the adams family and eddie munster haha
This is also time-consuming as hell. As with any at home regimen you have to be dedicated. The shortest workout night we have is an hour. The longest is 1 1/2 hours. Every. Night. We don’t do the optional nights off because we have been held up by Army a few times already so we figured we should just keep going while we can. There are some nights Hardscape is getting home at 10 and we are starting then. No excuses.
I made the pie box and put a cute little paper pie in it! I am making 3 different kinds, but I only have one finished to show you today.
Ambition also has these traits: it too is more external than internal. Unlike physical desires, which are satisfied simply by consumption, ambition requires the consensus of others. The honor-seeker, for example, has to be honored by as many people as possible in order to be satisfied.
At one point, in fact, Doc Bloom even asks Ricky how he could remember the night "Santa" killed his and Billy's parents, since he was a baby at the time, after all.
Therefore I think and judge it for thy best
Basic Grey chipboard letters and numbers. They are a few years old.
Never ask why.
To be a child of God is to know that we are God’s creation, that he chose the time and place of our birth, and that his individual plan for us began before even the world was born.
She said: “Willingham Parish Council recommends refusal because of the high proportion of Traveller sites already present in the village and the overwhelming opposition to any renewals or new sites until the problems relating to the illegal sites and proportionality have been addressed.
According to legend, Alexander was a gift from God (to the Macedonian royal family, of course – not to those countless families whose sons died in the wars he waged for 12 long years. Ever wonder why God always appears to favor royalty?)
In short, I guess this reminds me more of a tinted moisturiser than a BB cream - although I've had better coverage even with the Laura Mercier Tinted Moisturiser!
Or stuck in it giving birth?
Champ and chafe and toss in the spray.
- A for-profit education firm is soaking taxpayers by subleasing buildings to the Brooklyn public charter schools it runs at astronomical rates. NY Post
please don't worry about me. She knows I'm going to be just fine.
A chicken drumstick!
Fresh cilantro
One of the great pleasures of this writing life of mine has been meeting writers from all over the world who I would never have met before. Often, this happens via the blog. But recently, I met a very talented actor in London, Jonathan Chambers, and he told me about his mother, Diana McCaulay. Diana is from Jamaica and she has written a novel, Dog-Heart, which portrays the realities of life on the streets of Kingston and the seemingly uncrossable gulf between the classes. This is a novel with grit, humour, heart and pathos. It is both heart-breaking and uplifting at the same time, and beautifully written. But this is not for the faint of heart. To be honest, the cover made me think this was a story for the Young Adult category. Although adolescents would gain a lot from reading it, this is very much an adult tale.
And that's why I need your help. I need your recommendations for medium-to-short, highly readable fictions that are still rich enough in ideas, characterization, and writing style to be worth the time.
If I sound like I’m being overly harsh on a show that never marketed itself as being anything other than a primetime soap, I make no apologies. There are far better shows out there playing that game. What made Ringer infuriating was its insistence on insulting its audience with in-episode flashbacks, and characters so stupid it made it seem like the entirety of Lower Manhattan was experiencing carbon monoxide poisoning (if one more person, apropos of nothing, reminds Bridget of things Siobhan regularly does or doesn’t do I’ll kill her myself). If you’re going to earn yourself a reputation as a place where crazy plots reside, at least commit to the bit – have those bitches meet in episode seven, do a game-change in a mid-season finale, and dispatch one or more of the leads in the finale. Don’t whimper over the finish line by coasting on a mystery that you insist on not solving.
In the meantime, I will leave you with the recipe for passion fruit tart. You can omit the joconde and raspberry jelly, and just made a passionfruit tart, maybe with some raspberries on top. Have a happy Summer!
For a long time, I associated getting older with the loss of things. From hair to sanity, grandparents to friends, it always seemed I was more likely to lose rather than gain things after a certain age.
I find flashing LED’s on headsets to be annoying and serve no purpose whatsoever.
2. Prepare the tomato sauce. Heat the olive oil in a saucepan. Saute the onions until translucent. Add the garlic and diced tomatoes with their liquid. Add the sugar, vinegar, cayenne pepper, clove, cinnamon stick, and salt and pepper.
Like I mentioned, we made our wipes out of my hubby's old t-shirts. It felt good to repurpose those dingy whites that would have otherwise gone to waste, but you can use other fabrics you have lying around (maybe some old flannel sheets would be nice and soft on that baby's tush). We use straight water for our wipes solution which we keep in a little squeeze bottle next to the changing pad (we wet each wipe just before using because if you pre-wet your wipes you have such a short window of time before you'd need to start worrying about bacteria growth)...we tried using some other homemade solutions (that involved combinations of water, baby soap, olive oil, and/or tea tree oil), but after some more online research and our own trial and error, we found that straight up water was the least harsh on Little J's sensitive bum.
Instead I picked up 32 sts on each side of the button placket and knit 2x2 rib for 1.75". I am still waiting for my buttons to arrive.
“Over the last decade there has been a significant growth in interest in aspects of people’s experience with technologies under headings such as user experience, aesthetics, affect, fun, reflection, and enjoyment. In more recent years critical theory has begun to make a small but important impact at CHI conferences and other HCI publications. It is arguable that a relationship between critical theory and experience would benefit HCI research and practice as it has benefited other areas of research in the humanities and social sciences. However, in the history of ideas experience and critical theory have not always made good bedfellows, sometimes complementing each other, sometimes resisting each other. This workshop will explore the ways in which HCI might benefit from a constructive dialogue between critical theory and experience in questions of design and evaluation.”
Again 90% Mauzac and 10% Chardonnay. Also vinified and aged in oak. Somehow the oak accentuates the difference between the Mauzac and the Crémant, giving more vinosity to the wine. Mauzac is quite a rustic unrefined grape and the oak enhances that character but in an appealing way. The nose was quite rich and rounded, with a full-bodied rich herbal palate and some soft acidity. Nicely satisfying and very intriguing. M. Delmas explained that his father used to ferment all his wine in wood, and that the practice has been somewhat lost. Eventually he would like to build up some vins de reserve, so that he can include some oaked wine in all his cuvées, but that is a long term project.
Stop the death of these
Here is a beginning example of their magazines:
- In March 2008 Moloko and ­Ever Roaring were kicked off the project because of non-performance and another company had to complete the project;
My girls would love a new baby. Immy told her creche carers that Mummy was having a baby, and it is a boy. They believed her and asked me how the pregnancy was going.
But first, let me tell you guys about the gadgets i use daily.
I am afraid to speak the words. It's as if I avoid saying, "I'm losing my ability to verbalize my thoughts," then it won't be true. But it is.
An open homage (and worthy tribute) to pop-dramatist Dennis Potter, crafted by Alain Resnais – cinematic dark horse and homme à part of the French Nouvelle Vague – Same Old Song is a whimsical romp narrated via chanson moderne and a host of other quintessentially Gallic pop.
Your loveliness goes on and on, yes it does.
Some warlords will have returned and reverted to past practises. Freedom of the press will be limited. Human rights issues will have taken a backward step, with many Taliban values regaining their 1990s levels of prominence. The Taliban will continue to be a significant presence in the region, militarily and, increasingly, politically. The definition of “Taliban” will remain as difficult to pin down in 2018 as it is in 2008 and may involve some pro-Taliban groups in parliament and other groups resisting by force of arms.
Roberts, Michael 2006a “Pragmatic Action & Enchanted Worlds: A Black Tiger Rite of Commemoration,” Social Analysis, 50: 73-102.
I opened this bottle and let it sit for about 6 hours before pouring my first glass.
In my experience, once a cheater, always a cheater.
On Monday Bear goes to have blood work done and see a Doctor and have more tests done. Then on the 28th October he will start a series of injections, Filgrastim, to increase his stem cells. On 1 November they will remove the stem cell via taking blood, removing stem cells then putting the blood back into his body. It is called peripheral blood stem cell donation and if I had any medical know how, I would probably put it in better terms.
I have had a deep thought percolating in my mind of late. I thought I would share it. It is along the same lines as the idea that "life is more about the journey than the destination." I have been realizing that life is less about what the beauty and wonder of our creations here on earth and more about us learning to become creators.
- 1/2 tablespoon of sea salt
And then he sent me further.
Mate: So what do you think is the most dangerous car on the road?
Recipe:-
Now I understand what the pastor was TRYING to do, but my mind immediately went to the historical implications of that question. Let’s see, what comes to mind when I think of a burning cross? Let me think…
Black currant leaves are most delicately scented in the spring and then is the time to use them for flavouring sweets and all kinds of puddings.This is my own special recipe: Boil 1lb. of white sugar with 1/2 pint water and a cupful of young blackcurrant leaves. Boil without stirring, for 15 minutes; then strain and pour the hot syrup very gently on to 2 beaten egg whites. Beat all the time, till the mixture begins to thicken; then stir in the juice of a lemon and a gill of whipped cream.
You know, everywhere around Acadiana there are specialty
Now that I don’t really have to go to QC anymore, it’s difficult to find a reason to go to SM North especially since I’ve cured myself of my compulsive shopping habit and all SM malls are almost the same. Still, sometimes walking around a different mall is refreshing.
Not only that, but today I clobbered through notebook number four for the book. Granted, these are used notebooks, some with only forty sheets in them, but that’s still just about five hundred pages penned if you consider each side a page. With each page around two-hundred-fifty words, that’s 125,000 words!
Now, I have to admit that I don't like the name: Zoomers. Yes, there's just the teensiest bit of jealous territorialism about the Boomer identity. But it also makes me think of zooming around in scooters. It reminds me strongly of the Zimmer frame which is another word for those metal walkers without wheels. And it makes me think of time zooming along. Which it certainly does.
“Only Cheyenne,” I said; then it came to me. Cheyenne has a thing for Josh! “Well, I’ll be damned! My girl’s got it bad for another guy!” I set Jade down off my lap and walked in the yard to kick a few rocks and basically act like a fool, cussing and kicking, before going back to the porch.
I am back home now. I have apologised. The re-writes are done – at least until the next lot. I will try to remember that like a good story, life is full of ups and downs – and of beginnings and endings.
As I cook the risotto, I will add the veg paste and maybe a drop or two of cream. The remainder of the cooked veg will go into the risotto when it is almost finished. Some Parmesan Romano on top, salt and pepper and it's done. Maybe some grated lemon, also.
Stephen Adams, 51, New York, N.Y.
(Gerard's review: 100 stars)
So what led to the fracas at around 3.20pm?
We went to visit the sweet, sweet school where I taught 1st grade for a few years to say "hello" to friends. Afterward, we went shopping in our favorite outdoor mall.
Of course, it was painful, but my legs held up for the most part. My left calf got a pretty big cramp in it for a long time, but nothing I wasn’t able to run through. I walk/jogged intermittently from miles 10-12, but once I saw 12, I knew I was in the home stretch. Then my running playlist somehow switched to the entire playlist, so I ended up running to Hillsong in Spanish for awhile. Luckily I ran into my boss’s wife, and we finished really strong together!
would begin
Troy and I got to have two dates this weekend and it was just lovely!
Lapping slyness in
This indulgent first course marries three of Italy's best ingredients: egg pasta, winter truffles and Robiola Rocchetta, a creamy cheese from northern Italy, which forms the base for an incredibly rich sauce.
Another thing that upsets me is she changes her terms very often. When i got the job she told me i would have at least 20 hours a week guaranteed. Since she goes on vacations frequently i told her that at my other job i was getting more hours and that i was going to quit since she was not paying me when she traveled. I know I am only a part time nanny and she agreed to pay me half of the 20 hrs (10) when she was gone. When I told her i was going to quit she told me she was expecting her second child and that she wanted me to stay. But i feel that if she is so cheap .. is she even going to give me a raise when the second baby is here .. ? Highly doubted. What pushed my buttons was that she asked me to take her, her mom and baby to LAX on Thursday. So i did.. when i dropped them off all she said was Thank you for the ride! I was extremely upset she realized i was upset too but u didn't say anything. How can you work with someone who is that cheap? I mean im not her FREE TAXI! I mean we have to contract and i can quit but i love baby K and i don't know what to do. Can anyone give me helpfull tips. My other MB and their family are famous hollywood producers and they want me to quit and go work for them more hours. I have worked over two years with the other family so im not the problem.. But What should i do? Thanks!
and he rarely gets a call,
If the world really does end according to your prediction, then I will:
Bring it………..bring some trust. I cant do it any other way. I know that doesn’t make me different than anybody else. We all want love…….but Im not much of a lover if I cant make you see that Im trustworthy. Love and trust you build together. It doesn’t come with “just add water” and you can’t have one without the other. I’m going to learn Mandarin or Cantonese before the year is out. Can I get a fortune cookie with that?
Indeed, a massive contributing factor in Wimbledon FC’s original (and still continuing) problems of place was that swathes of matchgoing southwest London handily ignored them to support other ‘local’ clubs such as Chelsea, Fulham, Arsenal. The Dons were dismissable. And even now, with the Milton Keynes move widely derided and now firmly institutionalized against, Merton council are still seemingly disinterested in the club, who – as they did throughout the ’90s – have to make do playing miles from anything like a ‘spiritual’ home, groundsharing again (though this time as dominant partners) in the relative backwater of Norbiton.
I had these blocks with sayings on them that I had picked up at the thrift store to do something with. I painted them white (it took three coats to cover the sayings up completely). Then, I cut the Bow Ties are Cool (a quote of the doctor's) with the Ariel Black font in SCAL. The tricky part was the doctor. I was originally just going to hot glue a little bow tie on here, but then after playing around with an image of the doctor for a long time, I was able to get a fairly decent vector image to cut in SCAL. It is not perfect, and with the small cut, I think I lost some of the details, but I am happy with how these turned out.
After they had left for their respective homes in North Carolina I happen to run across an article about early television shows. Unfortunately, I ran across it in the waiting room of the Oncology Center at Good Samaritan as I waited for my mother to reemerge from her radiation treatment. I’d love to have that article to reference but I do not. Anyway, to make a long story short: I had a flash-back to my granddaughters visit, the little quibbles which were solved by loving parents, the joy and all the fun they had.
It is never preferable to take an animal’s life in this situation if avoidable. With regard to this bear, every effort had been made to take it humanely. Further complications of its recent aggressive behavior dictated a necessary and immediate action.
“Let me introduce Avpixlat (AP), a politically incorrect blog that reveals the truth about all things that the mainstream media in Sweden don´t dare to write about. It is based on facts, articles and official government statistics, that always can be checked. It is Sweden’s biggest political blog: http://avpixlat.info/ (Swedish Language – suggest using Google translate)
I don't know but I sure as hell am going to try my best to raise strong, independent girls.
Top pie with remaining peanut butter cups.
I have passed by this house my entire life. When I was little it was the highlight of going to the pediatrician's office. It has always happily worn yellow shutters, and the giant iron flower holder you see has always been in that very spot on the front lawn.
I went to the sweet shop to reward Joshua and Louis then we went to collect Louis’ repaired glasses, the whole episode had upset Joshua and he was anxious that the man may still be around, he insisted on pushing Robbie so that he could guard my bag and purse.
ear training. The one we want goes "Do-Do-Mi, Do-Do-Mi, Do-Do-Mi-So-Mi-Re-Do" if
Here we take a look at some of the activities you can get involved with to help keep you fit and healthy. Remember activities can be therapeutic and fun for people of all ages and abilities.
There is Kauwla – named so because he is the youngest in the group. The Josh machine loves being photographed and has a different pose for each click that we try of him. There is not a single one with a straight face.
Knowing what time it is at any point is crucial in today’s busy world. You may need to know when you have to be to work or school, when an appointment is, or even something as simple as when your favorite television show or ball game is going to be on. There are a variety of options for telling the time such as using a cell phone, a traditional wrist watch, or even a silver pocket watch which is both attractive and useful.
I'm entering this into the following fun challenges:
The new paper is by two economists who were working at the Federal Reserve’s Center for Behavioral Economics and Decisionmaking in Boston at the time they did the research. People at the Fed are very interested in understanding how the default crisis came about. “Most often, the reasons economists put forward are, maybe there was not enough screening for mortgage applicants, or securitization, or other institutional reasons,” says Stephan Meier, who is now at Columbia University. His coauthor, Charles Sprenger, is at Stanford University. ”That’s definitely important, but in the end humans make those repayment decisions. So there must be more psychological factors that explain how people make those decisions to default or not?”
"Peace Gull"
Quite so.
In perpetration I have been studying world building for hex crawls, initiative systems and more.
12715 Telge Road
my brother organized a surprise dessert, two warm soft chocolate cakes, that had a soufflé- like lava center! they came with vanilla ice cream and raspberry coulis- heavenly!
Pour a little sweet sherry over the sponge – too much can be a bit overpowering but you need enough to be able to taste it.
The cake-cookies in this recipe are another one of my cake batter cookie creations. This time I made them with sour cream instead of oil so they are super moist and soft.
Game Nutz, my own claimed Cheers in Sherrill, NY (and soon, Canastota), and employer of Boter and Sticky, who arrive me on their podcast, has just added me to its roster. Video amateur and gaming ability accept been my action aback I aboriginal captivated a ColecoVision ambassador at the age of three — that is why I started this blog and abutting the podcast — and I am appreciative and aflame to be animate achieve beyond my contrarily abortive adeptness of video gaming will be applicable. This aswell agency the achievability of accepting added autograph done, as I can accompany my laptop in and abode during downtime.
Murray
Victorian Elegance Theme Wedding: For anyone craving the romance of a bygone era, a Victorian theme wedding may be right for you. Rich colors and sumptuous lace, roses and cupids are all components that can be incorporated into your wedding decorations. The deep colors (burgundies, reds, mauves, dark blues and purples) and rich fabrics like velvet and lace are all well-suited for a fall or winter wedding. Keeping with the theme would be a high-necked gown with a full, layered skirt, lace-up boots and top hats and tails. Another spin on the Victorian theme would be a Victorian Christmas wedding.
am I getting too clingy with lilly?
Mix in olive oil, salt and peper to pumpkin, potato and swede (or whatever vegetables that take your fancy)
But the peplum is about to have a very big year, even though many of the fashion breathren don’t yet know what a peplum is. This ignorance is not surprising: the first thing that pops up when you Google peplum is a website devoted to films featuring Burt Lancaster and Charlton Heston in togas. “The most under-rated genre in the history of cinema” is how one blogger contentiously describes peplum movies, which also go by the soubriquet of sword-and-sandal movies. Further Googling confirms that both meanings derive from the Greek for tunic.
Back in 2007 when Christine Bakke and I founded Beyond Ex-Gay we discussed how those of us who have been through reparative therapies and ex-gay ministries need an opportunity to put on the record what we did, why we did it, what were the outcomes. So many other people have told our stories for us, but in the act of sharing it for ourselves, we can get more clarity and get a little bit more beyond our often harmful experiences to alter our orientation or gender differences.
Also, I feel I should mention that Psychopaint is ADDICTIVE. Put aside a hefty chunk of time because it’s pretty empowering and exhilarating to feel like you are on your way to becoming the next big thang in the art world. At least that’s how I feel…
Confronted with this as a scenario, my French friend is equivocal to slightly supportive.
NABC’s local connection Logo Designs is busy creating fresh allotments of t-shirts for the holiday season. There’ll be Hoptimus and “These Machines Kill Fascists” tees, and, for the first time, brewery (logo + “I’m for It”) shirts in longsleeve. Finally, another small release of the past summer’s Sportstime 20th anniversary tees (men’s and women’s styles) is coming out. NABC’s t-shirts are okay as stocking stuffers, but work even better when you just wear the damn things.
This seasonal variation has posed a key challenge to river basin planners and agriculturalists alike: how to capture and store the river’s waters for more gradual release. At a more fundamental level, but one that has been beyond the capacities of societies within the basin for the greater part of their history, has been the challenge of how to overcome the (sometimes) disastrous inter-annual variations in flow as well.
“We are fighting not only over that last remaining fragments of rainforest, but the very survival of orangutans.”
I don’t know about perfect pitch, but I wouldn’t be surprised if there is something a bit atypical about the way our brains process sounds. The enjoyment of music is very important to a number of people in our family, which I’m sure has something to do with the temporal lobes. A lot of the music that we enjoy is sung in non-English languages, languages from all corners of the world. I’m not sure how unusual our taste in music is, but there does seem to be a hunger in our family for listening to exotic phonemes. None of us are language savants like the famous British synaesthete Daniel Tammet, but there is a consistent line of descent in our family of bilingual or multi-lingual people. I also seem to have a thing about unusual voices. I choose to have people in my life who have unusual voices and I love to listen to distinctive singing voices of a range of types. For me, singing voices are easily categorized as interesting or not interesting, and I much prefer the former. The gravel-voiced rap singers Everlast and Tone Loc have interesting voices, and so do all counter-tenors. I recently read an interesting observation about the extraordinary sound of the counter-tenor voice in a newspaper interview article about German counter-tenor Andreas Scholl. “I think these days the audience knows what a countertenor is, but it’s that inability to readily categorise the voice that makes for better communication – you listen with fresh ears, and focus more on the words.” I believe this is an important element of my enjoyment of the voices of countertenors and other singers with interesting voices. The strangeness of the sound draws attention closely, finely, and it also destroys any set of simple musical expectations. I find strange sounds compelling and interesting, and I’m not sure why I find this so very enjoyable, but I do know from experience that when people enjoy doing anything involving thought, they are most likely utilizing some particular area of cognitive strength.
Melissa drained the noodles, setting the pot back on the range on a new cool burner. She then added the meat sauce to the pasta in the pot. I rinsed out the pan with hot water, which rinsed out very cleanly. My wife and I served ourselves with a side of Broccoli/Cauliflower which we microwaved in a bag. After serving and before eating, I saved the left-over spaghetti, then rinsed out the pot. It also rinsed out very well.
My blog is open again. I won't allow anyone to censor me anymore...
HEROMAN watches JONNY fall.
This is going to be a short post, since I'm working from my laptop while trying to get my new computer up and running. Yes.... new computer. You know what that means?? My computer died, and I had no choice but to go computer shopping. Luckily Weston ( oldest ds) is helping his old momma out. He found
modesty, says she was "flattered".
I spent an evening touring the brewery last week, and I have almost too much to report back on. He's brewing tripels, quadrupels, and sour beers ranging from lambic-style fruit beers to red ales (though none use brettanomyces, which Gansberg seems a little spooked about--based on my own experimentations, probably wisely so). Almost all of them are aged in oak for months to over a year, and many are double- or triple-fermented. It's an amazing range for a brewery that produces fewer than 1,500 barrels a year.
The advice I want to give is “Don’t chase it. If it happens, great. Go fight.” But the infantryman wants to be near the gunfire, and I understand that. I understand where they are coming from. I know how I grinned from ear to ear when my Company Commander told our company of paratroopers that we were deploying. I remember the mix of fear and excitement and I wouldn’t give it up for anything.
I, on the other hand was lost in thought about promises.
self-assured, confident and strongly convinced that I was doing precisely the right thing at any given moment and forging my Life Path in bare feet because I didn’t need the protection of extraneous things to impede my pace.
So I decided that my black Mary-Janes were no longer basics. When I stumbled over these red Mary-Janes I decided Red was the new basic, and I feel fabulous wearing them with every corporate outfit I own.
And I'm interested to read that article about Ponsonby dying. Haven't read it yet but I've really thought that it's starting to look a bit, I dunno, shabby, and not in a #bohochic way. When I take photographs around the city I have to muster the will to get up to the ol' Ponsonby Road. Because, and this is harsh, it reminds me exactly of Hamilton city's main strip. It's really just all about the big city jeeps up there.
All parts of this plant are poisonous except for the fruit. While people say the apple is edible, it is actually bitter (another name for it is wild lemon) and therefore requires quite a lot of sugar to make eating it worthwhile.
Whew, it's been quite a day. For me it started at 5:30am. Not on purpose, I just woke up at that time as Duane was coming to bed. His days and nights are messed up. I walked up to Target and Home Depot while he was sleeping. There are several new readers, so I'm linking to the worst night in February, so you'll understand why this 50th birthday is extra special.
“Harry…”
UN peace operations behind only
Tigas has also built a feature into the Onion Browser that allows the user-agent headers to be spoofed, which contain information about a person’s operating system, version numbers for plug-ins, system fonts and even screen size.
The giant wings beat harder, heaving the bird and its cargo upward. The Beast aimed to the side of the nest that overhung the sheer drop, intending to release the load over the deep ravine where it would shatter on the large black rocks far below. It struggled to gain altitude, wavering in the air as if pushed about by a strong gale. The load it carried felt heavy and limp. The Beast shrieked in frustration and pushed the wing muscles harder until they burned with effort.
Summer: “LALALALALALALALALALALA SQQQQUUEEAL!”
2-3 chicken feet, scored, optional
Stay tuned for my DIY crib bedding.
I’ll admit this isn’t much of a review but bear in mind that this sampling was done on March 14th, 2010, before my conversation with Erik Frank, the Deschutes Brand Ambassador. In that brief discussion, Mr. Frank made mention of a new style akin to a dark IPA and he used the term “cascadia.” Hmmm.
This month our Design Team was treated to a wonderful new product from Tsukineko called Fireworks! It’s a water-based, acid-free and non-toxic shimmer spray that coordinates with the Memento ink pad colors. We’re all using them in our projects today.
We visited the old Burra Burra Copper mine, which started as an underground mine in 1845 but in 1870 it became one of the first open cut mines in Australia. It is full of water now and musical concerts are held by the side of the lake.
“Before this season, MLS worked with all its players, coaches, referees and the two federations to develop, illustrate and discuss several key points of emphasis, One of those points of emphasis is to protect the safety of the player on the ball and reduce or eliminate reckless and violent tackles. Mullan’s tackle is the type of play we need to eliminate from our game and the level of discipline is consistent with our efforts to do so.”
We learned about Ike the horse's first home.
Front 242 No shuffle B
When we asked her to what extent the Celtic traditions were eradicated she drew upon modern New World history by reminding us of what the Spanish Conquistadors accomplished in Central American. In the New World all pre Columbus traditions, places of worship and ancient writing were destroyed. All traces of the Inca and Mayan cultures were purged and lost forever.
Sample Size: 22oz. brown bottle
Another thing that PG boasts is it being the inventor of the common Tea-bag. Legends! Can you imagine where we’d be using loose tea leaves all the time? I’d still be at home brewing it (Urgh I wish) and like many others probably wouldn’t bother too much to make tea. Don’t get me wrong, I love using loose tea and pretending to read the leaves but it’s a lot more washing up and hassle.
Phreak: Sorry.
In May 1508, signed a contract with Julius II for his masterpiece, the “Sistine Chapel“. The Sistine Chapel (entrance wall, south wall, north wall and cupola) is named after Pope Sixtus (pontiff 1471 – 1484) which made repaint the old “Cappella Magna”. The decoration of the walls includes: the false drapes, the Stories of Moses on the South wall, the Jesus Christ on the North wall and the portraits of Popes on south and north wall. Michelangelo, who travelled continously between Rome, Florence and Carrara (where he personally controlled the marble’s quality for his work) put everything aside and devoted himself to the chapel without interruption, until 1512.
Los Angeles (Dec. 12, 2011) – Sterling Archer, the world’s most dangerous spy, and his snarky ISIS cohorts are back for another outrageously raunchy season when ARCHER The Complete Second Season comes to Blu-ray and DVD on December 27th from Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment.
What I'm given to understand is that this particular object of derision (and my eternal anger) is somewhere in a substratum of the debris in his apartment. Until he can produce it, Western is loath-and also not obligated- to apply the credits in a matrix showing what he still needs to take. The problem is that he can be forced, for want of the old *&$@#! Johns Hopkins course catalog, to repeat courses for which he's actually received credit. This will remain an advising, and ultimately, a graduation-related issue until that catalog turns up. I applied a bit of time off and on trying to dig up another copy; I found it right off the bat this morning after not really having a chance to look thoroughly the last couple of days. This is going to require a bit of whining at the JHU archivist. I'm holding off until I hear whether or not his furtive stab at domiciliary archaeology proves fruitful.
Friday evening we worked (mostly Joe as I supervised) in the yard digging a 20 foot trench, 12 inches deep. Sounds like a fun Friday evening right? We have a slight flooding issue (aka Lake English) on one side of the front yard and needed to fix it while the ground was dry. Especially since Sunday's forecast was 2 inches of rainfall. Definitely a good testing ground with the rain and for us to sod the front yard! Woo hoo! More on this during The Lonely Lion Part 4 this week...
make your own nautical decor !!
This DadCentric piece I wrote last week is especially appropriate because it is the day before the tax filing deadline. I’m sure my dad will be franticly cranking out his clients’ returns late into tonight and tomorrow night. – Un.
JSB—Like the one fellow that you talked to that kept quiet about it for about 30 years.
"We're sorry but we need your expertise, we've set up a temporary office. Please, you know the ropes, you know the drill, we value your input, really."
— Søren Kierkegaard, in The Sickness Unto Death
I've agreed with Funki Blue in Aberystwyth my 'range' to complement my fabric greeting cards. One of the products we agreed on, is doorstops. But lets not beat about the bush, doorstops are not for posting.
The project would provide more than 15,344 construction jobs, as expressed in job-years, but, interestingly enough, the number of jobs would seesaw, in the first phase from as few as 340 jobs in a quarter to 3710 and in the second from 420 to 2215. That would lead to an average of 1500 jobs a year over 10 years, but it suggests that some workers would work only seasonally. (Click on the charts for a better view.)
In internet slang, “epic” means “extremely awesome”.
The secret to Bulgarian drinking is never showing drunkenness.
I knew there was a good
The bottle I'm drinking was bottled on 6th March 2010, so it has had a good year to mature.
Minutes become hours. Hours, days. Before we know it, years have passed.
"Shades of Grey"
UPDATE: 27th July, 2010. There has been some discussion about whether the adverse stress tests are sufficiently realistic, for example in the Telegraph and on irisheconomy.ie. The tone of the discussions has tended towards the view that the adverse stress tests were weak and declines in property prices in particular could well exceed the adverse scenario testing. Should the adverse scenario deteriorate then the effect on NAMA would be that the over-payment for loans would be accentuated and NAMA would need a greater improvement in the property market to break even.
My father suggested that I write about the history of Besançon and about the sites here. It's an obvious idea but I just never did it before. Not only will this be good for readers who would like to know more about this city but it will give me something to do! So for next time, I'll have something posted about this wonderful city!
“Relax…I still hunger for you” and with those words she felt the warmth of his tongue find itself against the lining of her pussy. She rolled in ecstasy closing her eyes tightly, her lips forming a smile. The world beneath her gone, she was floating, her body a new tenderness. She took her hands and grabbed his head forcing his tongue deeper inside her pussy. Still smiling, she began to curse, silently at first, then louder and louder until her body jumped and her hips raised, releasing silent requests only Lamar could understand. Orgasms rolled in and out of themselves pulsating about her entire body until she fell back to the Earth they’d forgotten.
"Well," I say a bit defensively, " I take hours to write a few hundred words of any blog posting. I can think about it, change it when it looks too stupid, and patch over the mistakes a bit."
Matthew 24:5-7 Many shall come in My name, saying, I am Christ; and shall deceive many. And ye shall hear of wars and rumours of wars: see that ye be not troubled: for all these things must come to pass, but the end is not yet. For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be famines, and pestilences, and earthquakes, in divers places.
I love grammar. I could happily diagram sentences for hours. I love the rules, the order, the patterns. The exceptions, the similarities between English and other languages.
Using my mind to hone in, I start to get nearer, and feel the voices.
I ended my Swiggin in Wiggin (the name of Wigan's Camra mag) here watching Saints v Leeds (there was surprisingly little anti-Saints feeling, more old blokes moaning about the ref - surprise, surprise)
In my day job, I am an educator, university level, in the biological sciences.
That's how you appreciate something-- you want it to happen. Now you know
09 - Flirtin' With Disaster 07:00
My hands are worn down by this cage
The first muslin also indicated that I needed a FBA and more length at the waist, so I did a 1/2" princess FBA, and added another 1/2" of length to the waist. This pattern must be drafted for the short waisted. I ended up adding a total of 1 and 5/8" at the waist, which is a lot, even for me. Oh, and I raised the neckline on the CF piece by 5/8".
Hey, this Saturday, Miss Oklahoma contestant Lyndzee Vieweg will visit El Reno for a fundraiser to show her support of Boys and Girls Clubs in Oklahoma. The Canadian County Salvation Army Boys & Girls Club will receive the proceeds from this endeavor.
I mean, I get her point, and I probably have made the same assertion about Jean Rhys (but more, girls should read Jean Rhys, not girls do read Jean Rhys, the difference seems crucial). And I adore Didion - I mean, I am a writer who went to a sport-competitive journalism school, the New Journalists were my literary lifeline. But my early twenties was way more gonzo and tequila than flowers in my fucking hair - I mean, I am and was drawn to Didion because she was a basketcase who made lists of her clothes, also because she's a brilliant, beautiful writer, and yet... Flanagan seems to dismiss Didion the writer and suggest that like Plath Didion is idolized for a persona, one she characterizes as that of the depressive pixie dream girl:
1st stop Hogle Zoo- And in all honesty I didn’t take many pictures, it was so crazy and I was mostly just trying to keep track of these three! There were buses and buses of field trip kids, and at some points you couldn’t even move we were so packed in! ah! Worth it though- the kids had fun! *cute little Brooklyn, she cracks me up, she dresses up for a lot of certain occasions (you could call her a version of Fancy Nancy), she picked out her panda bear shirt to pack for when we went to the zoo! ♥ her!
Another glaring time travel problem is why the Borg think stopping first contact is the best plan. Why not go back to prehistoric times and conquer earth then? Or, since they failed in this attempt, go back in time over and over again correcting the fatal flaw in their current plan until they get it right. See/ you have to assume whoever came up with the time travel plan is extremely shortsighted in order to enjoy the movie.
Last June 22nd, 2011 I was asked by Millicent Perry to speak at the Greater Ward Chapel AME Church Vacation Bible School. I was inspired to use Luke 10:29 and my topic was entitled “Who’s My NEIGHBOR“
Stefan Petrucha
If what I've posted so far sounded bitter, an incoherent rambling of a senile middle-aged balding man from Iowa, then please accept my apologies again.
Is that bad?
Sorry about the photo not being so great. I was fighting with the weather a bit over the weekend. Being new to the group, I have very few Texas related stamps. I'm going to have to come up with some creative ways to use the few I do have until I can purchase more. Since I've been in Christmas card mode lately, I decided to add another to the pile. Isn't this Texas flag ornament stamp the cutest?! I love it! I challenged myself to use more white space again. I'm kinda digging it. :)
"Yeah. I'm fine," I smiled.
The fluke is the duke of soul
Good luck to anyone who enters. The deadline is a month earlier than previous years - it's May 31st. Details here.
Sara Finds a Mitzva by Rebeka Simhaee with illustrations by Michael Weber
19. Richest Man In Babylon (G-Corp Remix)
P.S.The reason I am posting this at 12:30am is because I think tomorrow I will be too busy to post during real hours.
in your mind, a thought that you know makes you happy, that you substitute
For me it is hard to express what a band sets free in me, or why it touches me emotionally. For me music is a way to explore uncharted territory. That's what makes it so magical.
Kenneth Lieberthal, a China expert who was a top aide to president Bill Clinton, said he believed that the United States wanted a solution that is “the least embarrassing to China and to do so as expeditiously as possible.”
Finally, the biggest blast of colour, right now, is the forsythia bush at the front of my home. It has a definite golden glow that suits my sunny mood.
Haute couture: High sewing or high dressmaking. Couture is a common abbreviation of haute couture and refers to the same thing in spirit.
Flavour, says E@L inwardly off on a mental flight to the past, give me some fucking flavour here.
also the day that my tastebuds, well, piss right off. Which, as you can imagine, is utterly screwing delightful. Then Friday – and, for that matter, Saturday – gets worse yet: the tiredness becomes worrying, and to be perfectly honest I’m pretty bloody useless at anything that doesn’t involve moaning or getting dizzy on my way for a piss. But y’know what? I can cope with all that stuff. What I’m struggling to cope with more and more, however, is when the blues kick in. And this time, after a 15% increase in the drugs administered to me, they kicked in a bit more than we’d seen on my first two chemos.
Who makes the first move?
"My grandbaby's four months old...I'll have to bring the pictures so you can see her!"
They fail to mention: The bonus loophole was inserted by Democrat Senator Chris Dodd in the so-called Stimulus bill.
wait to feel if you get tapped
When I was researching, I discovered a couple of points from the archives that might to make you smile:
"when the sparky does actually arrive, can he please come equpped with electrical sparky workmen stuff, as opposed to a sparky that rings NOTHING in the way of tools"
A colourful descriptor of Mayawati’s “Eccentric Paranoia” says “When she needed new sandals, her private jet flew empty to Mumbai to retrieve her preferred brand.
* Did I mention to visit others and invite your readers to visit and view the linked up articles? Yeah, it's kind of important. That's the whole point of Artistic Tuesday, to share such amazing articles and creations with so many readers, and also to get a lot of visits on your linked up post as well.
Eco-Lies! Top Tasmania politician is shown up on TV News!
When they decide to take that step
stay.
ENERGY: The near coast to coast conservative State governments including NSW, Queensland and Victoria are all rushing to embrace mining and coal and gas exploration and “streamline” environmental protections. It’s like a gold rush – and I believe sand will be the next valuable commodity! With big business, these States are challenging and cancelling many schemes supporting renewable energy and energy efficiency. This must discourage investment at a time when other countries are investing heavily.
Remember you have 2 weeks to enter our Challenges and can enter any type of crafty creations you like! Just add your name to the linky below!
NO. OF ATTACKS: 1
and for a moment she wavered.
Seems like it's been a while since I've posted on here. I've been spending a lot of my time with family members and helping them to work at some serious family issues including my step father's suicide attempt (he attempted to OD on my mom's meds). In addition to those needs, my mother goes to dialysis four times a week in addition to her other weekly doctor appointments so I was running her to those appointments while my step-dad is/was recovering as he's usually "driving Ms. Daisy". As for my step-dad......he is alive and out of the hospital and doing much better now. He was started on Celexa and has been attending therapy sessions. There were apparently a lot of underlying issues that I did not know even existed because he's one of those "I don't need to talk about it" type of guys and my mother never really brought the issues to my attention because she didn't want to bother me about it since she thought he was just "speaking out of his ass" as she kindly put it. My mother then told me of the numerous times that he has threatened to "remove himself from the earth" and yet Mom never took him seriously. She never mentioned any of these things until it came out while he was recovering in the hospital.
1/3 cup roughly chopped fresh cilantro (optional)
-I like tartness so I used 1 cup cranberries. This recipe will be great with 3/4 cups as well.
Carl Schmitt and the Military Commissions Act of 2006
Reason for Choosing: My English teacher had a baby boy on Saturday and named him Weston, which is also her father’s middle name.
Kate xxooxx.
Charles has mostly brilliant ideas. That didn’t sound right. I mean it in a kind way, not a sarcastic one. He recommended a visit to the National Geographic Museum. Honestly, I hadn’t even heard of it – how bright is that? Blogless, I grabbed the 18-year-old – let’s just call him Son #2 – by the ear and we made our way there to view Machu Picchu: A Lost City Uncovered, Photographs from the Hiram Bingham Expeditions 1911–1915.
Looks like Kooi, Haag and Zulueta have all they need to move forward. Right? Not if Kooi were the one who walked the feds through on their audit. There’s a disconnect between what federal guidelines are and the findings of the federal audit. Another look is in order.
Version B
Make up your own Spray N' Wash with a few teaspoons of Cream of Tartar and some glycerin and you'll never have ring around the collar or underarm stains on shirt again. Just apply, let sit for 5-10 minutes, give a good scrub with a brush and wash with hot soapy water.
- Several subplots are introduced that feel unnecessary, either going nowhere or being resolved in a contrived fashion.
I gave you my phone number. However, I wish to re provide it. REDACTED (land line)
We were heading back to the hotel to pick up our bags and get driven to the airport when I saw a picture of our daughter Sonya's brother in law, Stephen Curry, on a bus stand. He is an actor and has the lead role in the film "The Cup".
I have to stay determined and stay focused and get some more folks involved.
"Well," he answered, "deal with sweating where it is most uncomfortable, and make peace with the rest of it. You have to sweat."
Duration: Approximately 93 minutes
We take up quarters in Moscow with his then friend-girl, Ms. M. We arrive at the train station in Red Square. There are still signs of the old USSR in the station and around Moscow but offending messages have been removed.
RYAN: You know, it’s not very evolved, but there’s nothing better than a raincoast crisp topped with Piave, a northern Italian cow’s milk cheese. But, in general, it pairs well with fish, garden vegetables, and Asian flavors… pretty much anything zesty, fresh or spicy.
Sierra Nevada
One thing is for sure, every time I hear this song I suddenly want to watch the show again! What about you?
This year’s highest new entry is Irish model Georgia Salpa. The Celebrity Big Brother contestant debuts at number five.
Current Pie Tally: 84
I can see the people of that time pinning down others using the LAW, instead of helping them up. I can see the LAW helping Pharisees in fault finding Jesus himself without it helping them to know, He’s the LAW maker.
Bang Gang
Oh yeah, our Valentines Dance last night was pretty fun. The kids really enjoyed it. They had GREAT decorations, games that the kids liked, and ice cream sundaes and cookies, that my kids LOVED! We stayed for about an hour, and then came back home. I did get a few pics, but my stupid camera wasn't taking clear pictures. You know, I think I should just go out and buy a cheap one from Wal-mart. At least that way it would fit in my purse, and I'd have it when I needed it. And those take decent pictures. To get a camera that takes FABULOUS pictures, you need to spend more than $150. That's just the cold, hard facts I'm afraid :)
Bitdefender Antivirus Plus 2012 And Zemana Antilogger License Giveaway – Here is a chance for all free AV users to get a Bitdefender Antivirus 2012 license free of cost, not only this, they can also get a Zemana Antilogger license with this award winning protection ( Both valid for 1 year ) to enhance their computer security. In total 10 winners will be announced ( 1 Bitdefender license + 1 Zemana license ) on 8th June.
Sunshine, sand, friends, fun, and food. A perfect day. We grilled hamburgers and hotdogs and had a blast. It was just a nice, relaxing day. And the water was COLD, but we were still in it :)
The plan has already been set. I plan on adding SEVERAL people to the group, in case the weak ones die out.
It was the first time the people of Glastonbury heard the tune when she sang it. And it has only been since she died that I've pieced together the timings and can see how the tale she told me links to the WI choral version.
Here are some pictures from my trip to HK. I proudly admit that I take very lousy photos, so don’t be shocked if you spit your noodles out when viewing the charred belly of a trashcan. Many of my close friends (and practically 75% of ACSI- my high school) have exhibited moderate to serious interest in it and I’m so happy because my newsfeed’s perpetually filled with gorgeous images and I don’t even have to forklift my ass off the chair.
June 1995; Kathmandu, Nepal; with two hundred
One reason is that customers in the US would be confused, they are not used to thinking about beer this way. But the British are used to it, thanks to a large excise tax that is levied on the final alcohol content of the beer itself. Below you can see the current excise rate. Note that lower strength beer (up to 2.8%) is taxed at half the rate, which is why you'll often see breweries brew a low strength beer in the UK so that they can sell it for much less money (I had a great one at Greene King).
Mormon? A religion? The only religions I know of are the Presbyterians, Protestants, and the Catholics. The doctrine fell from the sky in upstate New York? Was the founder an indian? Well, I’ve only ever seen indians up there. I quite like them. They’re the reason I make a mean popcorn.
Are you among the mindless sheep and KoolAid drinkers, or are you just a happy and content citizen? Together we can turn around this runaway train called out of control goverrnment spending and get our economy back on track.
Self sufficient and off the grid....Our goals!
Yeah, “largely discards the original’s premise.” As if they’re just warning you not to rent this crap! And yes, this is real; the Highlanders are aliens, complete with a plot about what amounts to saving the world from global warming. Are we still in the same universe? How does this have ANYTHING to do with Highlander? And it’s by the same director as the first one?!? Did he just get a surprise back-alley lobotomy in between films? There’s only a three year difference! What the hell happened? Well, I guess we’ll never find out if we just sit around bitching about it all afternoon.
"You're buying on your day off," Jessica reminded her.
Women – cry over melodramatic movies.
Btw, one of my favorite YA bloggers, the wonderful Diana at 'Stop, Drop and Read' has just left a message in the comments about what she's doing to help. She's giving away free arcs and will donate shipping costs to the Red Cross in Canada so they can send more help to Japan. Here is the link and I hope you all go and visit her.
For me, it makes a great deal of sense to follow Blaising’s lead here and read the cup of God’s wrath in the sense found in Isaiah. The fact that Jesus constantly refers to Isaiah 40-55 is evidence that this is what he has in mind in the garden. In addition, I worry about what it says about Jesus if he was praying to avoid the cross if at all possible. The cross was not just a possibility, it was the whole reason for the incarnation. Jesus would not consider avoiding the cross since he came to serve and to give his life as a ransom for many (Mark 10:45).
So yesterday, there were a few yard sales going on in my area. I have raised my kids to love yard sales, too. They love finding treasures. We headed to the grocery store first, and then off to yard sales- my first of the season! I spent a total of $7 and check out what I got!
(The Bible, Genesis 11: 1-10)
Later, I realized it's probably not a good idea cooking with aspartame so I think I'd look for some soda that has sucralose in it instead or heck, you could probably use real soda since it's only 2 points for an entire can.
A group of almost half owl-half human characters appeared over a few days painting and they seemed to be alive and could do with a home, it seemed perfect to set them free in people’s living rooms.
But for so long the politicians were blind to all of this. In Bath, one of England’s most beautiful cities, the Liberal Democrat-led council even proposed to erect a 240ft wind turbine on the hills just to the south. The scheme was heavily promoted by a local landowner, the only person who stood to benefit in windfall profits. It was only after mass protests, and a threat by UNESCO to take away the city’s world heritage status, was the proposal reluctantly dropped.
But that’s not really what I set out to write about. What I meant to write about is the life changing power of laughter.
How it all started. Back In the 6th century apparently, a Buddhist monk brought tea to Japan. Jump forward to the 16th century and you have these Portuguese missionary guys introducing tea to the Europeans. The world just hasn’t been the same. I started this series of posts about Tea a few weeks ago and went on a quest to find the Best Tea in the World. Needless to say that is an impossible task however, I’ll tell you what I consider the best if you tell me yours. You can see my recommendation in a minute.
Lindsay looks and acts like the perfect fifteen year-old, but she’s hiding a dirty little secret that no amount of fashionista coverings can make better. Telling her mother her step-father is molesting her is not an option. Trying to kill herself again haunts her more than the scars on her wrists, and pretending to be perfect at school might very well drive her over the edge.
As long as it's filled with tea parties, laughter with good friends and loved ones, sunny days and golden afternoons,we will be sugar sweet happy.
But after much soul searching, he eventually was baptized at Trinity United Church of Christ.
Accessories: Pearls (Kaisercraft), White embossing powder, Seam binding, Rose (Prima), Twine (May Arts), Foam tape, Thread, Sewing machine.
We had a turkey dinner, and I made turkey soup with the leftovers. My dad cooked us lots of hearty breakfasts, and we ate lots of red meat, including venison nachos. Rowan learned how to crawl up stairs. We played copious amounts of late-night double Pinochle, in between Rowan's wake ups.
Me (browsing the wall of phones): “Babes I don’t know which phone to get. I like this one but I don’t know if it gets Instagram.”
Proprietors: Beth Notaro & Elizabeth Gentry will delight your senses with their OVER DYED HOMESPUNS, WOOLS & TEXTILES, ANTIQUE LINENS, EARLY REPRODUCTION FURNITURE, HISTORICAL SAMPLERS & HANDWORK, NEEDFULS, SMALLS, PENNY RUGS, DRIEDS, SMELL GOODS, ANTIQUES, ONE OF A KINDS, WOOL ROVING, PATTERNS, KITS & SUPPLIES, DOLLS & EXTREME PRIMITIVES... WE WILL ALSO HAVE PORCH & GARDEN DWELLERS SELLING THEIR WARES... TWISTERS, SISTERS & MISTERS, RUG MATTERS HOOKING GROUP & THE GRANNY BEE'S WILL BE DEMONSTRATING BOTH DAYS...
Weird morning! This morning I was walking from the parking lot in my University to my office. Everything was quiet. It as 10 a.m., so students were in their 10 a.m. classes. It was bright and sunny. The sun had finally shown up after weeks of torturous cold. I was walking on the side-walk, telling myself what beautiful day it was. I saw a silver Pontiac approaching. Then something completely out-of-the-blue happened. The driver of the car took his hands off the wheel, stretched out both his hands towards me, sprung out his two middle fingers, and angrily shouted aloud, "fuck you!". It was loud enough that I could hear it from outside, even with the car windows pulled up.
It consists, Ickenham says, of "any good dry champagne, to which is added liqueur brandy, armagnac, kümmel, yellow liqueur, and old stout, to taste." He adds that it's pretty much guaranteed to alleviate the deepest despondency.
It has sentenced Tim to 41 years in jail for procuring girls for prostitution and gave Lloyd a 21-year jail term for raping minors.
Congrats to Elizabeth on her debut novel FURY :)
- Pretzel rods, baby carrots of if I was lucky, chips
Well, as of last night, we were at 1.025, which puts us at 9.2%, if it were to finish up here, but, alas, it is not done fermenting. There is still activity in the airlock, so there's a chance that it'll drop a few more points. If we get close to 1.020, I'll be mighty happy.
Noodles
Had we known how much fun farm camp would be we could have planned for all three kids to go the same week. As it happened, Maya was initially the only one interested. After hearing about & seeing how much fun she had, Riley & Seth decided they wanted to give it a try. This week was Seth's turn, and he loved it just as much as he thought he would. Maybe more. In a few weeks, Ri will be going to the veterinary-themed camp for the older kids.
Ego never ending. Because they are the shit. Probably successful and very good looking (and not the “yeah he’s cute”! The “oh my God I’d lick your body from head to toe right here right now!” Kind of good looking) Ambitious. A golddigger’s prime target!
Liv is hilarious though. She says the funniest things. Sunday I went into our little bathroom in our room to change and throw on some make-up and she followed me in there, shut the door and said "mama, what da matter?". I looked at her and laughed then said "nothings the matter Liv" and she continued on with "tell me what da matter?". Haha, there was absolutely nothing wrong, but it was so cute and thoughtful that she felt the need to come ask. I don't get to see that side of her every day.
Here I'm... excited to sample the Davidoff Puro D'Oro. The cigar is a new blend whose major characteristic is that all the tobacco is sourced from Dominican Republic, hence the reference to being pure in the name.
I have made a scrapbook page this week for a frame so I thought I would enter it into a couple of challenges. Truly Scruptious #73 (Love and Hearts - as this is a photo of me and my Dad I think the love goes with saying), and Divas by Design #20 (Anything Goes). I have used MME Stella Rose and Kraft paper for the main pieces and just found other bits from the bit box. I covered a piece of cardboard with burlap for the background of the photo, the large heart of course is an inked doily. It was a bit of a dul day when I took the photo so it's not a very good picture, really does look so much much 'for real'
This time he managed to pull himself upright, but he quickly fell right into bed and was sound asleep the second his head hit the pillow.
To that end, I give you TG's official far-reaching sucker-upper attachment:
Suarez also said she never would have complained about not being paid had she known the agent was part of Mr Obama’s security detail.
You might recognise one of the Spring Stashbusting Tags that I originally made with some of the littlest scraps from last October's Counterfeit Kit - truly the kit that never dies! I snuck it into my one of my latest counterfeit kits - Country Retreat - because the colours matched so well - and because I already had an idea of how I wanted to use it. Always a bonus!
I found out last summer (last August) that I can still hit a high B (that’s the high(est) note that Anna Netrebko – who is awesome, and probably my favourite opera singer as of last year – hits when she sings Quando Men Vo from La Boheme).
Your goal for LDL levels should be under 100 mg/dL for people with heart disease or diabetes. For people of normal risk, your LDL levels should be between 100 and 129 mg/dL. Anything above 160 ml/dL is considered high and puts you at a higher risk for heart disease.
However, intuition can be a tricky subject. I have dealt with many clients who confuse delusions or illusive tendencies with intuition. This could be misguiding to them, creating anxiety and confusion. The reason for this is that while intuition is something we all have and can access, it needs activation.
Leaving the pity party...
Again, the emphasis here is on Grosvenor being at least upfront and open about these charges and not delivering a whammy after the author submits a manuscript and signs the contract. The package also includes the usual PDF proof, ISBN number (registered to Grosvenor), internet distribution for one year, and also wholesale distribution listing with Bertrams and Gardners. In addition, the author gets five free copies and legal registration.
Her crystalizing and shattering in his arms was actually fairly powerful, and Shu’s normal insufferable whininess actually sounded pained here. So props for this scene, at least.
I feel so lucky to have found a doctor that we can not only be confident in but who communicates regularly that should something go awry with regards to Bennett's care, he will be there to help us figure it out. I appreciate this aspect of Bennett's doctor tremendously because...
“It’s way too soon,” she said, to come to definitive conclusions. But she said the “numbers have gone way up.”
4) Giselle
Birdie’s – 75th and Antioch
Imogen: Don't worry Mum, the mice will show up soon to help you.
Busy Busy Busy week (What's new???) Got TONS of stuff done, despite the fact that the spring "SOCIAL" season has begun. Every day brought at least two visitors, which meant stopping for long chats, sometimes over coffee. Oy vay! It's hard to get back into work, but such is life in the Friendly "Hood"!
My challenge for you is to "Use Something You've Been Hoarding." My favorite color is purple, and I've been hanging onto this last piece of Echo Park dsp for some time now, so I decided to just give in and use it :) Another hoarded item is that great piece of mesh I added to this card for a little "beachy" interest. I colored the image with Copics, and paper-pieced the umbrella with matching dsp. The image and sentiment are by SNSS called Ocean Paradise and I die cut it using a SB labels eighteen. The clouds were sponged on using Ranger tumbled glass ink and a hand-made cloud template. I can't help but wish I was sitting in that chair right about now :)
His smug thoughts were interrupted by a rustling sound from behind. He turned to examine the source. Oh, No. Damn Him. Not now. Through a narrow opening in the thicket, a lone figure emerged, his sack of tools tethered to his back with sturdy ropes. He waved a greeting to Sharshar and then went about his business. The intruder, Sharshar had learned, was dubbed ‘Mr. Think’ by the residents of Qabqab. (the name derived from his habit of asking his assistants to always think before acting.) But in his presence he was always addressed as ‘chief’, an affront to his down-to-earth mannerism. He was the youngest son of a well-to-do farmer, and he’d left the village at a young age. Coming back years later with few stories to tell but with plenty of ideas to carry out useful projects, and with the experience and the knowledge to do them well.
We will be presenting some of the work we have been doing on the Stratford Corsair so come see the Stratford Corsair and her Crew at Sikorsky Memorial Airport September 7-8-9 9am to 5pm and take a ride in a vintage WW2 Bomber! (you have to pay for the ride)
Half Moon Restaurant and Brewery
Thirdly, as noted by other commentators, several procedural issues remain outstanding despite Tugendhat J's conclusion that the 'case will now proceed to trial in the usual way in accordance with the CPR'. For example, although it seems unlikely that Mr Edwards and Michael Mendahun (named as a defendant because the sex video was available on a website operated by him) would oppose the grant of a permanent injunction, there is no procedure for obtaining a permanent injunction against 'generally described persons' such as the second defendant. In these circumstances, it is suggested that Tulisa would need to obtain a 'contra mundum' ('against the world') order against either Mr Edwards or Mr Mendahun. However, obtaining such an order may not be straightforward as neither Mr Edwards nor Mr Mendahun appears to be threatening further publication of the sex tape.
That news made me so sad.
Love and blessings to all of you my friends!
But I have to say though, in fairness, that this mentality is NOT unique to America. It’s happening all over the world, wherever free enterprise thrives. But you know what, in other places such as the Philippines, their concept of “BIG” is definitely not the same as what’s considered as such here.
A lot of my coworkers are crazy about the thing, but I just can’t stand the thought of yet another giant leap forward in technology so soon after I’m barely comfortable with my Enviro-Sak. I feel like I’m living in one of those rapidly emerging cultures of Asia, where half a generation ago nobody even had a landline phone, and now everyone’s walking the streets with the latest in wireless.
Now Salon reports that major airlines like British Airways, Qantas and Air New Zealand have policies that prohibit unaccompanied children from being seated next to male passengers in the name of child welfare (or more likely, litigation concerns). Personally, I'd just as soon not risk being seated next to a fidgeting germ factory on a long-distance flight to Christchurch, but the implication that having a penis somehow renders me unfit to be seated next to a child is sexist and disgusting.
You will only know what this title refers to if you listened to Randy Travis and country music back in the 80″s. Randy said he was going back to his friends who bought their “coffee beans already ground”….hum the tune if you know it.
Also linking up to Patti at Visible Monday. This outfit may not have seemed so visible, but for me, it was. It was just so different from what I would have worn a few years ago. And isn't that what it's all about?
You are starting to have more conscious inner conversations with your Higher Self as you go about your Earthly duties and much guidance comes through to you.
The first issue of a brand new journal published by Mohr Siebeck entitled Hebrew Bible and Ancient Israel is available for public access here. Here is the TOC:
In 1985 Moe and Younis were detained by the Security Police and in later years Moe tearfully told of how he had been tortured.
Here's my finished card...
Then of course I have bigger dreams - to finish my book and get it published. To make a living from writing - wouldn't that be great, I'd needn't feel guilty about the time it uses then!
Location : Nehru Place, Delhi.
December 17, 1991
For an example of facilitating through the use of technology, watch the video below and note the use of the stick to guide the student's touches:
Hi everyone! I will be celebrating my birthday next month. To make my birthday extra special, I will be holding my first ever giveaway event! This is also a way of giving thanks to all of you, my lovely followers, for patronising my blog. I have not finalized the rules/ details as well as the goodies I am giving away but I will definitely announce them soon.
Then I took my fufu and light soup home and ate it fast while I cooked macaroni because my right hand was starting to swell and I had the feeling I wouldn’t be using it very much come Thursday (I was right) but that my stomach would still be demanding food (right again).
Lastly we have my newly appointed scrapbook desk, which is still under construction and organization efforts...I have not scrapbooked in some 3 or 4 years sadly, nor have I printed the 60,987 pictures on my computer. But, as you can see I am working on that. In theory anyway. Also you will see I painted the bathroom door with chalkboard paint. Good times.
Mostly - my respect for members of the 501st increased by a million. I can't imagine wearing this armor for a few hours, let alone all day. Then there's the dedication to making the costume.
A year later I think it's fair to say that Ruby's transition to a pampered life with a pair of besotted humans has gone smoothly. She remains a quiet girl who rarely barks and only occasionally whines. Moose sometimes supposes this behavior is a result of neglect and isolation in her early life. Poor Ruby never learned she could use her voice to command humans and order her world. That, of course, is one reason we've heard relatively little from her here on the blog. In other respects, though, Ruby is remarkably transformed from the skinny critter she was a year ago. Daily exercise and a better diet have bulked her up considerably. Her paw pads, which were soft as a baby's behind when she arrived in Roxie's World, are now thick with callouses. She enjoys walks, but the concept of play is still something of a mystery to her. Unlike me, she won't hang out in the yard by herself for extended periods of time, chasing squirrels, digging holes, and woofing at anything that moves. In the company of a human, however, she will race from one end of the ridiculously large backyard to the other in crazy figure 8s. Moose is trying to capture this delightful activity on film for the pleasure of my readers. Stay tuned.
Fear is not an option when you are a homeowner.
New rules: Like I said, a bit of change is nice every once in a while. Here’s the catch, though: I have to be honest with you, I do quite like the current Codex. While that will probably devalue anything I have to say on the matter for many, let’s take a look:
thank him for his grace!
Jan 13 – Shahrizat takes leave from her official duties to make way for the MACC’s probe on whether or not she had any involvement in the NFCorp issue.
That would have been enough to convince me, but to tell you the truth, by that point I was already being won over. Never mind what she looked like – she smelled just like my mother. There are scents that just always stay with you, you know? And for whatever reason I’ve always had a pretty sharp sense of smell. Not that that’s always been a positive thing in some parts of Orgrimmar, let me tell you. Anyway, though…the more time I spent around this woman, the more I noticed it – that smell I can’t really describe but would always recognize when she was close to me, like old parchment and dreaming glories. Like comfort. Like home.
The pretty butterfly is cut at 1.75 x 2.66 distressed and used foam tape for dimension. The frame for the sentiment is cut at 3 3/4 plus the layers and embossed with the divine swirls folder. The sentiment is from K.Andrew Designs ~Positive Thoughts set. Ties it off with a pretty satin double bow:)
I stopped into Roots yesterday to see if I could rustle up either some Epic or the Chocolate Habanero Stout. Epic isn't out til Thursday, but the Habanero's pouring (or burning, depending on your palate). To refresh your memory, last year's version was a fascinating beer. The chocolatey stout was up front, not the chilis. At first, you didn't notice but a touch of spice, but then at swallow, the fire warmed up enough to kindle some sparks going down. It was a subtle background note. Over time, the spiciness would collect at the back of your throat, though, and it would slowly warm up.
Last Man in the Tower by Aravind Adiga, winner of the Booker Award for White Tiger. It's complex, full of rich characters with unexpected humor. I think we'll be able to expect that from him in future books as well.
Sonny Morgan: congas
Shadow: It is no use woman. That’s her fate, now it’s time to find yours.
As a Goddess of the moon Diana ruled over the light that influenced the crops and pregnancy in women.
But this year - after only 12 years of marriage, I have finally figured it out. Even though they say we are NOT going to exchange gifts- they don't mean it. That is actually code for "Bring gifts. Something nice preferably."
The other Pred scrutinized the boy, then declared, “Be that as it may, I can still use this to my advantage. Tupper shall be my talisman against gaudy beasts with ready fangs!”
We must also be mindful that an adjudication of neglect carries long-reaching consequences. This finding may be used against K.H. in subsequent proceedings, including proceedings to remove the children from the home or to terminate her parental rights. A finding of neglect may also carry a personal or social stigma far beyond the limited circumstances involved in this case. Thus, the courts should be very careful about making such a finding merely out of caution.
....or should I say Operation Right Hand! Today (Monday) I am heading into hospital for an operation on my right hand (my dominant one) which involves removing some bone and tying together my thumb and my index finger. It's a bit complicated for me as I don't actually have a lot of index finger on that hand, due to a childhood accident, but I have managed for nearly 60 years to continue to use my dominant hand. Indeed I taught students to type and later to use a computer keyboard and was able to use my lack of a finger as all the more reason why they should be able to achieve good typing skills - if I could, they could!
I look back on this first initial reaction I had when hearing about an Equal Money System for the first time and find it quite fascinating at how I was able to completely, disregard/dismiss this point of having any value what so ever.
Fort Wayne, IN
Anywho, grilled cheese was eaten; grilled cheese was loved.
I guess we're both in a sea of I don't knows...Fear too.
If you do not use the word, the people who use the word will still have the same unacceptable misconceived wankiness in their brain. Changing the word is trying to mask symptoms. It does not cure the disease.
they're hot!
I happened to catch an episode of My So-Called Life today while flipping through channels in an effort to find something to entertain me as I measured clothing.
Most historians, using their own hands, would never dream of handling anything other than the extreme edges of a document. They certainly wouldn't run their bare fingers along the text. It just feels wrong. The delusion that a glove is something clean breaks down that psychological barrier. Hence the amateur genealogists on telly pointing their way though letters and registers like five-year-olds learning to read.
Architecture Sans Frontières-UK
Certainties? One or two.
Anyways, the naked butt mat rocks, and you need one. I’m sure of that. Baby girl does her best rolling sans diaper, and truth be told, it’s the only way we could get her to agree to tummy time early on. Tummy time + diaper = much screaming; but naked tummy time = superawesomefunsmilesgigglesandjoyfulsqueals. File that one under Important Things We’ve Learned in the past 8 (!?!?!!!!) months.
2.) Being featured on Angie's pretty blog, "A Little Inspiration." And for being reminded of what inspires me: my children, my faith, my small corner of the world and the good people who occupy it. Thank you, Angie!
When one faces death he begins to realise what is truly important and necessary. Earthly possessions really aren’t that important for, as they say, “you can’t take it with you.” There were certain things on that boat they could do without. They were now seeing that those physical things were becoming a hindrance rather than a necessity. That, no doubt, is true with many who are now hearing this message.
I already miss all your comments and blogs I often look at (even if I remain silent) ! ;-)
Sweet swirling stitches
Congratulations to our winners, please contact us at challenges@easycraftprojects.net to claim your prizes.
1/4 Cup Whole Wheat Flour
John McHugo, chair of Lib Dem Friends of Palestine, says, “This is a witchhunt based on trial by blog. Jenny’s motivation in speaking up for the rights of the oppressed is anger at injustice when others, who have the duty to speak out, pass by silently on the other side of the street. It is also an attempt to make Jenny the story, and to detract attention from the evils of Israel’s occupation.”
Savard: Who.
I blossomed
The sound from Firpo's recording would have been relatively imperfect, but the image makes me want to know more: where was the studio, how did the musicians get there, what was the weather like? A day in Buenos Aires long ago, a tango recorded, and some sweet, slightly distant music we can still hear.
Oh yea...the day after I underwent permanent body art for my dogs, Oakley decided my iPhone needed to be her new chewtoy. That's puppy love for ya ;)
If you’ve read part I of this post (here) you know why being a “perfectaholic” is a problem that can kill your creativity. So what’s the “perfectaholic” cure?
I have too many things to feature them all here, so I'll just show you my favorites - just click the links above if you want to check out everything I've got! :)
It’s not just the shark, either. Later, while in his Adam West persona, he’s kidnapped while putting the moves on Miss Kitka Karenska (really Catwoman) in her hotel room. When he’s brought to the villainous lair (a flimsy room upstairs in a dive bar), he promises the bad guys he’ll kill them if they’ve hurt Kitka. Not, “I’ll bring you to justice, evil doers,” but “I will f*cking rip your heart out of your chests, feed it to the others, then sh*tstomp your faces so hard people will think there’s four f*cking Clayface’s running around.”
20He which testifieth these things saith, Surely I come quickly. Amen. Even so, come, Lord Jesus.
This is what life is all about.
Before you seriously begin a real estate investment, make sure you consider the real risks that you would be taking with a venture like that. A new investor is likely to learn the hard way that there are serious downsides to being new to the game. Take time to gain knowledge about real estate investing before you put your money on the line.
Even less accurate is the Psychological Stress Evaluator (PSE), sometimes referred to as a Voice Stress Evaluator. Supposedly, during a lie, the voice reaches a higher pitch than when someone is telling the truth. While the PSE does measure variations in emotional stress, that’s not necessarily indicative of deception.
Their jobs were morally complex,
I really don’t care about who really cares,time will tell.The situations are changing rapidly and we are in front of many changes.But I wish you were fighting by my side for a brand new world.Our new world.And it’s impossible.I would never ever take away your hopes .The contrary,I take hope from you.And I will miss you the coming days.Or the coming years,I don’t have a clue.
Baking tray
–SHARP-SHINNED HAWK, Calgary’s Oakridge neighborhood, Margaret Brunner
the most unimaginably unattractive ensemble you can think of. a black hooded zip-up sweatshirt and brown cotton short drawstring yoga pants. both with food from isaac's messy hands all over them.
Just when you thought that California couldn't get any crazier they find a way to do just that. Enter Assembly Bill 1960, which enables owners of businesses that contract to the state to identify themselves as LGBT. Please don't ever tell me that the state of California doesn't have their priorities straight as to what is important in the day to day lives of the people living there. I mean, who wouldn't think it's important to tell the government ones sexual orientation? And just why would the state of California require this information anyway? Well, one can only speculate, but my guess is that if a person were to identify with the new elite and untouchable class - the fabulous LGBT peeps - then your business would get a great big green light for the state to do business with. Gone are the days when the business playing field was level and no one was interested who you poked in the dark as long as you got the job done - enter the days where your sexual orientation is more important above all else. Just where is the enough-line drawn with this LGBT crowd? Now that they have successfully lobbied the lobotomised bureaucrats, what's next? Maybe they should push to tattoo the foreheads of everyone who isn't part of the LGBT community? Take their children away? Chase them out of the state? Keep it up California - your state is doing real great! No budget - tick. No money - tick. High debt - tick. Happy LGBT community - tick, tick, tock.
Now, in the 21st century, jewish power and influence increase essentially unchecked. For the last six decades the jews have gone into overdrive, generalizing and adapting elements of their narrative to other "minorities". Slowly but surely this is what has turned European-founded societies inside out and upside down. When jews and other diversities exclaim, "Diversity is our greatest strength", they are exactly right.
Eli grinned and took my coat, walking it to the coat closet by the door. “Have a seat at the table. I’ve a laptop for you there.”
“The day after the bowel movement.”
Or how about Col Gaddafi, who stated:
I'm using 28 count opalescent white evenweave. Instead of the Crescent Colors silk the pattern calls for, I'm using Vicki Clayton hand-dyed silk floss in Blue Sky.
15Behold, I come as a thief. Blessed is he that watcheth, and keepeth his garments, lest he walk naked, and they see his shame.
Even regular reporters noticed that the factory in question closed under, yes, George W. Bush — a fact Romney failed to mention, although his campaign scrambled to cover for him afterwards.
you are Love embodied
I have high hopes of reaching our goal of $8,000 to the CSPs in Haiti and Ethiopia. It seems impossible, unlikely, far-fetched, but I am still praying for it. I feel so privileged to be a small partner with the work Compassion is doing through the Child Survival Program. You can be too!
fame in the 70's
"Dad, I really like this bean and would like it to be kinda special."
Sadly we lose one member of Team R this week, Lisa, thank you for all your hard and stunning work, good luck in your crafty future.
Let me first clear up something: there is nothing sexy about your semen. It’s got the texture of Elmer’s glue mixed with the scent of chlorine and sweaty balls. It’s a fucking chlorinated, sweaty ball stew. I don’t care how diligently you’ve studied porn (oh, that was your major in college?), we are not thirsty for your sticky juice. I was lucky enough to discuss this topic with my girlfriends this past weekend and we’ve all agreed, yo’ jizz don’t taste so good. One of my friends did reveal that her ex who ate a lot of fruit (pineapples, strawberries) tasted sweet. The same food items that make our twats taste good have the same benefits for you. However, most of you live on steak, potatoes, french fries, burgers…making your ‘izz taste like ‘ish. But I digress, because we all agreed that we’d much rather suck your dick than lick a pussy. You guys have it rough too. Anyway, girls still swallow sometimes, so what does it mean?
"Winners named in "HandsOffMyDesign" Competition
OTR to MP3 – July 9th, 2011, Shore Leave 33:
I would love to offer up something amazingly poignant today but I simply don’t have it in me after the Philadelphia Flyers came back from an early 3-0 deficit to beat the Pittsburgh Penguins 4-3 in overtime.
Diddy-Dirty Money perform “Coming Home”
Susie’s cousin Bobby (totally not his name either) is in my class as well. One day when his older sister (a former student of mine) came in to the school to drop Bobby off, one of the other students said to Susie, “Your sister is in the hall.” Susie yelled back at them, ”That’s not my sister! That’s my twin!” Ok, this one needs some description (I really am LOL.) The ”twin” (really her cousin) is about 3 years older, dark complected with long, black hair. Susie is about 2.5 feet tall, very pale, with long blonde hair.
This outfit makes a cute "big girl" room. There is a good mix of sophisticated and playful pieces in a not too girly color palette. I kind of want to me this one happen. Anyone have a daughter who needs a new room?
Today was our second class and it was all about Analogous colours. Analagous colours lay beside each other on the colour wheel. Beside turquoise heading towards the greens is first aqua blue. As the fabrics I found in that colour were very close to my turquoise (the colour shift was very subtle), I chose to skip that one move on to the next colour, aqua green and then blue green. Below are the two rows of fabrics I chose in each of those colours.
Mix flour, nuts and soda,
Although I was on the edge of my seat for Cassia and Ky to find each other, the book as a whole did seem somehow bland. The characters travel around quite a bit and undergo some introspection, but a curious lack of tension and foreboding meant the plot suffers as a result. There’s also a nagging sense of familiarity: if Matched felt like The Giver, Crossed feels like the Obernewtyn series by Isobelle Carmody.
But really, all I want to say out loud is... I'm really proud of me for doing this... sticking with it... and keeping an open mind with some of the foods they want me to eat. It's been tough, but I have prevailed through 1/3 of the entire plan. In the famous words of Helen Reddy, "I Am Woman! Hear Me Roar!"
Spring means many things here in Lotus Land.
Jews Hate Whites may be an idiot, but his anger is justifiable. And when one contemplates the political imprint of America’s Jews in the last 100 years, from Max Shachtman to Noam Chomsky, from the Jewish Socialist League of America in the 30’s to the Jewish Alliance for Law and Social Action in the 90s, from Saul Alinsky to the Rosenbergs, from Abbie Hoffman to George Soros, from Ruth Bader Ginsburg to Ramona Ripston to the current crop of Jewish politicians in Congress and machers in the White House, one begins to worry less about the veracity of the MacDonald hypothesis and more because of the veracity of his facts.
It's hard to write these days. Hard to know what to say...it's hard to know what to do. How can I be so incredibly happy when I feel so completely empty without you in our lives?
Excerpted from The Secret Life of a Fool: One Man's Raw Journey from Shame to Grace by Andrew Palau, © 2012. Published by Worthy Publishing, a division of Worthy Media, Inc., Brentwood, TN. http://www.worthypublishing.com/. Used by permission.
Started a couple of projects this week and this is where I'm at.
If you haven’t seen the show the little dog, Blue, has this great super power called “Skadoo”. Basically she sings a little jingle and jumps into any picture or book and she’s magically in the scene. If I could have any super power, this might be it. I could open a travel book and magically be in Fiji…it would rock. Connor thinks so, too.
Dreaming as the summers die:
While awaiting details, some dreamers are encouraged by his proposal.
and run your fingers along its chambers. Until you grow older,
on the new online crafting club called
We can look at the "Island" as a stop in the adventure/experience/game/journey as one of the levels/planes. We can even acknowledge the final scene in this episode with Christian opening the church doors as next level or "Game over."
So now you are airing on TV, you have trackable viewership, and starting to get a feel for the industry. Get out there and show these big companies that you can help them grow your business. A little secret the tracking viewers thing almost no one dose that, it my number one closing feature for my sponsorship sales.
São Paulo – (55) 11 3664-3848
These are super easy to make and with only four ingredients, you should give them a shot! Someone in your house will thank you!
98And once the lot of Abelard and me.
I told you I'd been gathering colouring tips whilst I've been away and I hope I've managed to use some of them in this 'portrait' - I certainly feel I've got some reasonable shading going on here. I hope my niece will like it.
on week two....your postcard will be sent from person B to person A...and so on.
If possible, do this in a separate meeting. When I was at Lakeshore Community Church the leadership often made use of 15 minute quick meetings between services to give teams simple updates. On more weighty issues, like culture change, another venue with no time constraints is better. Answer questions. Be kind. Use “I” statements, and do not ever down the old system. DO explain where the team is going and how the old system is not able to get you there.
and vegetable print vest.
Both components of my blog name were truer at one point than they are now. I was rude, and once upon a time, I was but a boy.
Link to THEE post on your blog with your WOW cards, not just your blog.
The ward is all but empty, a single human at the desk. An orderly patrols the corridors with the disinterest of Archorid in daylight. Aware that no alarm will sound, just a console light ignored by the distracted nurse, she knows what must be done.
If you browse through the above mentioned flickr group 'Food Photography Club' you will find many more examples on the use of negative space in food photography.
Big Audio Dynamite II is the second incarnation of the alternative dance group Big Audio Dynamite, formed after all original BAD members except for singer/guitarist Mick Jones left the band in 1990. Under this name, the band released only one album ''The Globe'' in 1991, which contained the hit singles ''Rush'' and ''The Globe''.
The boat trip to the market place was decent, though the birds where a bit out of control. With our loot bags in tow, we spent the better part of the day haggling prices with merchants. Overall, Bransen does make a good haggler, even with his simple ways. While in the market, Jarvyk brought up the topic of help Ashton look for his missing father, another necromancer. I didn’t know they ran in packs, I always thought of them as loner types… well, minus the undead of course. Can’t count them for company these days, so little intelligence in today’s undead. What is the world coming to? Anyways, I offered to help ‘cause where there are mages, there is money, ‘cause spells just don’t create themselves, you know. Unless your Bransen. Sodding cleric in denial.
Wembley is probably the first thing that springs to mind however, in terms of carrying forward into the next campaign, a strong finish in the league is in many ways just as important?
do with enjoying them in the yard.
I assumption I can say that my TV watching habits as a kid in actuality angled the artisan I became. I'm just in actuality animated Beyblade didn't await on abundant metal or country for their action music. Who knows beyond I'd be then...
What were once tiny stubs on the sides of their puff-ball-bellies are now sprouting feathers, a few even have teeeeeeeeny little rump feathers poking out of their fuzz, like our RIRs and the SLW.
However, have made good start.
Anyway, on to making the speech or at least outlining it. I need to try doing the relaxation podcasts I was sent to get me in the state of mind tomorrow, but hopefully all will go well.
Cut or rub in the butter until coarse.
And now we wait. It's been a day now and we've got nought but originals.
While the SRS is not yet considered a diagnostic instrument, a T-score of 60, one SD above the mean, is currently the SRS-based cut-off for an autistic spectrum diagnosis. Standard scores from 60 to 75 currently indicate SRS-based "mild to moderate" autism; 76 or higher is the SRS-based "severe" autism range.
I always knew that phase was precious in its fleetingness. Once you know a city and develop a routine and relationships, time takes on its regular cadence. Tick tock. Tick tock. The magic and possibility, while still there, aren’t felt as strongly. Soon, they no longer tease and lead you to new sensations and experiences. Only because your heart, curiosity and eyes aren’t open as wide. (Which, I don’t think is tragic, but, rather makes the fleeting stage more beautiful.)
I recommend this book highly. It is well paced and there are some gorgeous passages. I do have some minor reservations: the formatting is not consistent, the proofreading could have been better, and sometimes—but not a lot—the dialogue is stilted. But these quibbles hardly sink what is a fine read.
It's a simple matter, however, to discourage on-the-fly spell trading without arbitrarily forbidding it. All you have to do is make it a long, difficult, expensive and risky process, and it will happen rarely, if at all.
February 14th. A day to celebrate love with flowers, chocolate, romance. Sounds wonderful if you have someone to love, or even the hope of finding your true love, but if you are one of the many bereft whose beloved has died, the day brings not romance but tears. You remember that once you were loved, that once you loved. Of course, you still do love — love doesn’t die — but loving the eternal essence of someone who is dead is not exactly the same thing as loving someone who is present in body and mind and heart and voice.
“I pray thee forgive our barbaric ways, my lady. There is no mounting block. If I may be so bold as to offer my services?”
In a post last Thursday, Alan praised an hypothesis described by Arianna Huffington and attributed to Eric Schmidt, ceo of Google, that the internet is a kind of antidote for lies, smears, and general bullshit.
Yellow cake with strawberry jam and a swirl of cream cheese frosting
James 1:8 A double minded man is unstable in all his ways.
Having had a telescope since I was thirteen, I am fascinated by the starry sky and can identify most of the major constellations. Given this time of the calendar year, I knew that the constellation Scorpius would be in the southern portion of the sky. I scanned the lower portion of the southern horizon to find the tell-tale star of the Scorpion, the crimson Antares.
9.) doesn’t matter
The heading of this post is the tagline of a wonderful book that I’m reading currently. I was browsing in a bookshop( one of my favorite occupations) when I happened upon this book in the non-fiction section. The title was ‘Leading Ladies’ penned by Sudha Menon. For a moment I stood there, indecisive about picking up the book. When I did pick up the book, I turned a few pages, put it back on the shelf, moved on, then came back, looked at it some more and then on an impulse decide to buy it. And boy, am I glad I bought it.
Here's another thing - with stuff like paralyzed, we're dealing more in describing what happens rather than trying to make everything mechanical. So paralyzed says that you can' t move your limbs. Spellcasting specifies that you need to move your arms to cast a spell. Thus, a paralyzed creature can't cast
Yeah. Markers and highlighting in pink ink. They’re all just passages I want to remember… things I found interesting; descriptions of favorite characters; awesome scenes. I don’t usually do this with books; usually I treat them like sacred relics. But there’s too much to remember with Lord of the Rings, and my brain is not that powerful to simply know where it all is.
Wednesday I celebrated granddaughter Gigi's first birthday with her. Her mommy had bought a mylar balloon for her and we need not have bought other presents. She spent about 30 minutes bouncing the balloon up and down, giggling hysterically the entire time. There is nothing like a baby's laugh, is there?
Little Man is babbling more today. He crawls around saying "ba ba ba". It is so precious (and a little sad, knowing that in 2 short years he will be talking nonstop to the point where I'm begging him to watch a movie so he stops talking). Every mother deserves a little quiet time. :)
My ribs are still a little sore.
Other strategies of treatment consist of freezing and you can get hold of aerosol spray to freeze the warts yourself. Some people report that utilizing duct tape or maybe electric tape can suffocate the hpv warts. You’ll want to hold the duct tape secure continually and remove it only a number of times which usually tends to make this treatment challenging.
Walker’s victory comes with a consequence. He could have had Michelle. He could have ditched his wife and his kids for a fetching young vixen. He chooses his family instead. It is not a decision he will likely ever regret, but he’ll carry the burden of making that decision, always. Michelle’s last words (“Don’t leave me alone”) will be on his mind for the rest of his days. I think this is what Frantic is ultimately about: the choice of love over lust. But I think it also asks something else: can love be found in lust, too?
I don't have time to talk about the cheese. I'd hate to bore you.
I really like to be “model-coach” and help other to get the small details away from the photo from the beginning instead of getting the afterwork in photoshop.
Of course, we all know that marijuana does not really alleviate pain. Especially the kind of pain I’m having. I guess this would be a good time for an interlude about what I’m going through, First, the hand, on the surface, is healing too well. The scar is raising up, in some places as much as 2mm above my hand. This is known as a keloid. I am not a fan of this. My family doctor looked at my hand and said that it looked “Frankensteinish” (Thank you Dr. Johnston).
Here's part 2 of an entry here on scene structure with a link to the previous part.
He was frozen; hidden beneath the kitchen counter. The phone was directly above his head; help
Break-ups.
Peel the apples and beetroot, grate them finely..Take the sugar,milk powder, grated apples and beets in a microwave safe bowl..cook in microwave oven for 20minutes in high power (stir twice in between)..Take the oats in an another microwave safe bowl,cook in high power for 2minutes until they turns bit crispy..Now add the rolled oats,cardamom powder,ghee to the almost cooked halwa and cook again for 10minutes until the ghee get separates (stir in between)..
We start out with four journalists (Bill Hader, Kenan Thompson, Jay Pharaoh, Taran Killam) expressing their mutual adoration of Jeremy Lin by doing terrible puns with his surname, just like your dime-a-dozen local sports anchor. This could have been the entire sketch, and I would have been satisfied that it made fun of how terrible some of today’s smug sports “journalists” are.
Step 1. Sand until the paint is gone.
First, line a 9 x 12 pan with wax or parchment paper, and brush the bottom and sides with vegetable oil. Set it aside.
Dead Heat is the latest novel from Bronwyn Parry and it had been on my radar for a little while. I’d seen some good reviews and I do love a good suspenseful mystery. When I finally got my hands on it by way of my local library, I was definitely not disappointed. Dead Heat opens with a bang with Jo discovering the body of a dead man that, they later discover, has been tortured horribly before finally being shot.
Mark speaks of three apparitions: The first, when He appeared to Mary Magdalene; the second, when He appeared to His two disciples, who went to Emmaus; and the third, when He appeared to His eleven disciples, whom He reproaches for their incredulity.
In an attempt to polish Islam's image, muslim activists usually quote verses from the Koran that were written in the early days of the Islamic movement, while Mohammed lived in Mecca. Those passages make Islam appear loving and harmless because they call for love, peace and patience. Such is a deception. The activists fail to tell gullible people that such verses, though still in the Koran, were nullified, abrogated, rendered void by later passages that incite killing, decapitations, maiming, terrorism and religious intolerance. The latter verses were penned while Mohammed’s headquarters was based in Medina.
And here is mummy duck herself, what a clever girl she is!
In agreement with the Supreme Court ruling on June 3, 1993, Janet Reno ordered the Delta Force and Navy Seals to Switzerland, England, and Israel to recapture trillions of dollars of gold stolen by the Federal Reserve System from the strategic gold reserves. These nations cooperated with the raid because they were promised their debts owed to the United States would be canceled and because the people who stole the money from the United States also stole money from their nations as well.
other GOP presidential candidates have seen their fortunes wax and wane with voters, Ron Paul has enjoyed steadfast, if relatively low level, support from an obsessively loyal base of backers. But if his long-shot bid falls short, his supporters may balk at throwing their votes to a rival."
He knows nothing about black hair. He doesnt even know what a weave is. Heck, he knows nothing about hair in general. He washes his own hair with a regular bar of soap. Im not talking about chagrin valley im talking irish springs or dove.
Meanwhile, here are a few great posts from around the web...
Once Wonder Boy got old enough to drag along, I started taking him to everything -- and I mean, everything -- that was remotely "kid-friendly" just so I could get my movie theatre fix.
Then beat at high speed 6-8 minutes or till stiff peaks form.
‘Butter’ by Adnan Mahmutovic
I quite enjoyed it as a News Bulletin and it made me wonder whether it was just the novelty of a different take on the days events that had me so impressed or is BBC Scotland really just a parochial wee sideshow with no interest beyond the Old Firm and what Labour have to say about the SNP?
This past two weeks I’ve been experiencing a sort of reading frenzy. Here are some of the books I’ve read. I’ve added a rating as well.
The 80mm lens and the film Ilford Delta 100.
“Those people in New York are not gonna change me none.”
just a month ago at parity with the Rand, it was a desperate move by the
In another sense, however, Farred’s remarks reveal a mind preconditioned to see racism everywhere, even where it clearly doesn’t exist. This is, after all, a professor who produced a 95-page essay claiming that something that occurs every day in the NBA—a coach complaining about fouls called on his best player—actually showed how the “NBA is once again fraught with the ghostly presence of race, now refracted through the Asian body.” (p. 15)
A BEAUTIFUL Holy Thursday mass
If ever you need a word of encouragement in return - well, I'm yer girl :)
In many fields, professionals say you need to log 10,000 hours to become an expert. For new teachers, that can take about five years, and those first five years are often the most challenging…. Read the full story here.
I am worthless at night. Night is the absolute worst. Kevin is my hero and for the past 4 months taken care of me, the girls & the house. So thankful for him.
It can only mean one thing...it's the last day of the SXSW and time for the Saturday preview.
My mother has this saying she uses when a person is unwittingly showing his or her true colours: “ahhhhh (insert name) yuh petticoat showing!”
I took these photos yesterday of Miss Pearl and some sunflowers.
A good example is the current debate about whether oil companies should receive tax subsidies. President Obama favored cutting off these subsidies because these companies made millions in profits last year. That is, they don’t need the corporate welfare of the state in order to survive in the free market. Republican, on the other hand, argued for continuing the corporate welfare of these companies, advocating an inherently protectionist or interventionist approach to the market. On this issue, the parties switched: Obama supported a free market measure where Republicans advocated a position that was inherently interventionist (and thus in their own parlance, big government). No one has really noted this change whatsoever. It makes sense, however. It’s like 1984, where Republicans advocated Keynsian growth while Democrats advocated for fiscal conservatism. If both parties are dominated by business interests, then it is just a means of revealing the shifting business interests and needs. This is why I think that the liberal-conservative divide is a red herring because it means we don’t notice the ways in which our party system is united.
Finally, in this week (and it's only Tuesday!) of looking back, I am celebrating Joe Polin, a former student, whose beautiful essay was published in the Pennsylvania Gazette last year. Joe is coming to class with editor Trey Popp to talk about how an assignment becomes a story becomes a submission becomes an edited final piece.
I am so happy that I followed my heart in that moment, rather than what I thought I 'should' do, or what someone else expected me to do. I looked at my child. It was simple to know what to do. *Listen* to him. *Honor* him. Right then, right there.
